Project Gutenberg's The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car, by Laura Lee Hope

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car
       The Haunted Mansion of Shadow Valley

Author: Laura Lee Hope

Release Date: October 17, 2006 [EBook #19561]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR ***




Produced by Marilynda Fraser-Cunliffe, J.P.W. Fraser, Emmy
and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net








  The Outdoor Girls
  In A Motor Car

  OR

  THE HAUNTED MANSION OF
  SHADOW VALLEY

  BY
  LAURA LEE HOPE

          AUTHOR OF "THE OUTDOOR GIRLS OF DEEPDALE," "THE
          OUTDOOR GIRLS AT RAINBOW LAKE," "THE BOBBSEY
          TWINS," "THE BOBBSEY TWINS IN THE COUNTRY," ETC.


_ILLUSTRATED_

          NEW YORK
          GROSSET & DUNLAP
          PUBLISHERS

Made in the United States of America




BOOKS FOR GIRLS

BY LAURA LEE HOPE

       *       *       *       *       *

12mo. Cloth. Illustrated. Price per volume, 50 cents, postpaid.

       *       *       *       *       *

=THE OUTDOOR GIRLS SERIES=

          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS OF DEEPDALE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT RAINBOW LAKE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A WINTER CAMP
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN FLORIDA


=THE BOBBSEY TWINS BOOKS=

For Little Men and Women

          THE BOBBSEY TWINS
          THE BOBBSEY TWINS IN THE COUNTRY
          THE BOBBSEY TWINS AT THE SEASHORE
          THE BOBBSEY TWINS AT SCHOOL
          THE BOBBSEY TWINS AT SNOW LODGE

       *       *       *       *       *

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK

          COPYRIGHT, 1913, BY
          GROSSET & DUNLAP.

       *       *       *       *       *

THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR.

[Illustration: "TOPPLED FROM THE TREE, ALMOST IN FRONT OF THE CAR."

_The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car_ _Frontispiece_ (_Page 13_)]




CONTENTS


          CHAPTER                                PAGE

              I OUT OF A TREE                      1

             II A STRANGE GIRL                    14

            III STRANGELY MISSING                 24

             IV THE QUEER PEDDLER                 31

              V PAUL AT THE WHEEL                 41

             VI A TOUR PROPOSED                   48

            VII MR. LAGG'S OFFER                  56

           VIII IN THE MUD                        68

             IX IN SHADOW VALLEY                  77

              X OFF ON THE TOUR                   84

             XI A TRACE OF THE GIRL               93

            XII A DISABLED CAR                   104

           XIII THE STORM                        110

            XIV AT THE HAUNTED HOUSE             121

             XV QUEER MANIFESTATIONS             129

            XVI "SO YOU HAVE COME BACK!"         138

           XVII CONSTERNATION                    147

          XVIII THE PRISONER                     153

            XIX MYSTIFIED                        160

             XX SEEKING THE GHOST                168

            XXI THE MISSING GIRL                 177

           XXII A SWINDLED FARMER                184

          XXIII "THAT'S THE MAN!"                195

           XXIV THE FAKER CAUGHT                 199

            XXV EXPLANATIONS                     204




THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR




CHAPTER I

OUT OF A TREE


"Come on, girls, the car is here, and this time I'm going to run it
myself!"

"You never are, Mollie Billette!" exclaimed Grace Ford, as, with three
companions, she hurried to the window of the library of the Billette
home, and looked out toward the street, up which was coming a luxurious
touring car of the latest model.

"Aren't you afraid?" asked Amy Stonington, as she looked admiringly at
Mollie, whose cheeks were flushed with excitement.

"Oh, it simply gives me the creeps to think about it!" added Grace.

"I don't see why," spoke Mollie, as the car, in charge of a
demonstrator, came to a stop in front of her house. "I've taken enough
lessons, the garage man says; I have my license, and why shouldn't I run
my car? Are you afraid to come with me?"

"No--no, it isn't exactly that," said Amy, slowly as she fastened the
strings of her new motoring hood--all the girls had them, and very
becoming they were. "It isn't exactly that, Mollie, but you know----"

"If you weren't afraid to go with Betty in her motor boat, I don't see
why you should be afraid to come with me in the car," went on Mollie.
"Oh, what did I do with my goggles?" she asked as she hurriedly looked
about the room, lifting up a pile of books and papers on a table. "I
know I had them, and----"

"Look!" exclaimed Betty Nelson with a laugh. "Dodo and Paul are trying
to pull them apart. I suppose they think the goggles are big enough for
two," and she pointed to where the twins, Mollie's little brother and
sister, were seated on the velvety lawn, both having hold of a new pair
of auto goggles, and gravely trying to separate the two eye pieces.

"The little rascals!" cried Mollie, though she, too had to join in the
laughter of her chums. "Paul!" she called. "Dodo! Come here this instant
with my goggles!"

The children looked up, their dispute forgotten.

"Us hasn't any doddles--us got tecticals!" exclaimed Paul.

"Well, those are sister's spectacles--to wear in the auto so the dust
won't get in her eyes," explained Mollie, as she approached the twins,
"Give them to sister."

"Oo et us wide in tar us dive um to oo," stipulated Dodo, holding the
goggles behind her back.

"Not to-day, pet," said Mollie, sweetly--compromisingly.

Dodo arose, and backed away, limping slightly, for she was not quite
recovered from a recent operation as the result of a peculiar accident.
She held the goggles out of reach, and, walking with her eyes fixed on
her sister, she was in danger of stumbling.

"She'll fall and break them," cried Grace.

"That's what I'm afraid of," said Mollie. "Come, Dodo, give the glasses
to sister."

"Her dive um for tandy!" cried the crafty Paul, seeing a chance to make
capital out of his little sister's strategic move. "Us dive oo glasses
for tandy; won't us, Dodo?"

"Us will," assented Dora--or Dodo, as she was almost universally called.
"Us dive for tandy--lots of tandy."

"The little rascals," laughed Mollie. "I wish I dared rush at her and
take them away. But she might fall----" and with the recollection of
what little Dodo had suffered, Mollie gave up her plan of action. The
chauffeur tooted on the auto horn, as much as to say:

"Come, I'm waiting for you."

"Oh, dear!" exclaimed Mollie. "Have any of you----"

"Grace, will you kindly oblige?" asked Betty, with a laugh. "Surely you
are not without chocolates on this momentous occasion."

"I don't see why you assume that I always have candy," remarked the
tall, slender girl, whose willowy figure added to the charm of her face,
framed in a wealth of light hair.

"Oh, we know your failing," laughed Betty. "Come, Grace, you are
delaying the game, and if we are going for an auto ride with
Mollie--let--let's have it--over with."

"Well, I like the way you speak!" exclaimed Mollie, rather
sharply--Mollie had a failing in her quick temper. "If you girls are
afraid to come in my new car, just because I'm going to steer all alone,
why----"

"Oh, Mollie, I didn't mean it that way at all!" protested Betty. "I just
didn't want Grace to feel----"

"Where is tandy?" demanded Paul, as he approached his little sister,
evidently with the intention of again assuming the dispute over the
goggles in case no confectionery was forthcoming.

"Grace, have you any?" asked Mollie, beseechingly. "We _must_ get
started, and the day is so fine we don't want to miss any of it.
Paul--Dodo--don't you dare break my glasses!" She shook a warning finger
at them.

"I just _happen_ to have some chocolates," said Grace, with an air of
injured dignity. From the pocket of her sweater she produced a small
box, and held it out to Dodo. The child, with a glad cry, dropped the
goggles on the grass and sprang for Grace. Paul, too, joined in the
race, and while Mollie picked up her recovered property the twins, with
a new matter to contend about, gravely sat down on the lawn, and
proceeded to divide the candy.

"Now come on!" cried Mollie, "before something else happens. Be good
children!" she cautioned them, "and don't go away."

"No," they chorused, while Paul added:

"Bring us more tandy--not bery much here."

"Which speaks well for the appetite of Grace," murmured Amy.

"Oh, let me alone!" protested Grace, with as near a show of temper as
she ever indulged in. Mollie looked at her and remarked:

"You're getting my complaint, Grace dear."

"Well, I'm tired of always having candy thrown in my face--what if I do
like chocolate?"

"You should have thrown the candy in her mouth--not in her face,"
laughed Betty, and then Grace smiled instead of frowning, and the four
chums--the Outdoor Girls, as they had come to be called from living so
much in the open--walked across the lawn to the waiting car.

"It certainly is a beauty!" declared Grace, as her eyes, and those of
her friends, took in all the details of the auto. "Mollie, you are a
lucky girl, and so is Betty with her motor boat. Amy, I wonder what good
fortune is coming to us?"

"It will have to be an airship in your case, Grace," said Mollie. "One
boat and one car is enough. You had better pray for an aeroplane."

"Never!" assented Grace. "The land and water are enough for me."

"And as for Amy," said Betty, "she wants a balloon, perhaps."

Amy shook her head, and a strange look came over her face. Her chums
knew what it meant--that above everything else she would have preferred
having the mystery of her identity solved.

"Well, if we're going to mote--let's mote!" exclaimed Mollie, perhaps
with a desire to change the subject. "I'm going to take you for a nice
long spin."

"Aren't you nervous--to think of being at the wheel without some one
beside to help you in case of emergency?" asked Betty.

"Were you, in the _Gem_?" retorted Mollie.

"A little, but then, you know, a motor boat doesn't go as fast as a
car--somehow you seem to have a better chance in case of collisions, or
accidents."

"There aren't going to be any collisions or accidents," declared Mollie,
with conviction. "I'm going to be careful until I get a little more
accustomed to it, and then----"

"You'll scorch, like all the others, I suppose," put in Amy.

"Never! Now who's going to ride with me on the front seat?"

For a moment no one answered--Betty, Grace and Amy looked at one
another, and then they burst into laughter.

"Well, do you want to draw lots for it?" inquired Mollie, with a trace
of sarcasm. "I thought you'd feel honored."

"I will!" exclaimed Betty. "But you will be careful; won't you, Mollie
dear?"

"Of course. I'm no more anxious to get into trouble than you are. Oh,
what did I do with my handkerchief?"

"It's up your sleeve," said Grace, indicating a bulge in Mollie's
sweater.

"Well, come on!" exclaimed the owner of the new car.

"She says it as though she were--going to--jail!" laughed Grace.

The demonstrator had alighted from the car, and was looking it over,
testing the tires with his hand.

"Is it all right, Mr. Ransom?" asked Mollie, a bit anxiously. "Is
anything the matter?"

"Not a thing, Miss Billette," he replied. "It is in perfect order. And
I'm sure you can run it alone very easily. You have had a number of
lessons, and you learned very quickly."

"If only I remember to let out my clutch before I change gears," Mollie
murmured.

"Oh, you'll remember that," returned the chauffeur, to give her the
confidence he saw she needed.

"I'll remind you of it," volunteered Betty.

The girls got into the car, and the man, impressing a few important
facts on the pretty girl driver, lifted his cap as Mollie pressed the
button of the self-starter.

"Here we go!" cried Grace, as the motor throbbed and hummed.

Carefully Mollie threw out the clutch, and slipped in first speed. Then
releasing the clutch pedal gradually she felt the car move slowly
forward. A flush of pleasure came to her face; for, though she had
several times performed this feat of late, the demonstrator had always
sat beside her. Now she was doing it alone.

"Fine!" cried Betty, as the car gathered speed.

"You're all right!" Mr. Ransom called after the girls.

From first to second gear, and then in another moment to high, was
performed by Mollie without a hitch. Then she advanced the spark and gas
levers.

"Well, so far--so good!" spoke Amy, with a sigh of relief.

"I knew Mollie could do it," declared Betty. "Look out for that wagon,
my dear," she cried, a second later.

"I see it," and Mollie gave it such a wide berth that she sent her car
needlessly to the grassy part of the country highway that led out of
Deepdale.

"I don't want more than my half of the road," good-naturedly called the
farmer who was driving the horse-drawn vehicle. "If all motorists were
as generous as you there'd be no complaints," and he smiled and lifted
his cap.

"It's better to be sure than sorry," said Mollie. "Well, girls, how do
you like it?" and she ventured to turn around for an instant to speak to
Grace and Amy in the tonneau.

"It's scrumptious!" declared Grace, between bites at a chocolate.

"Lovely," chimed in Amy.

"However did you prevail on your mother to get you the car?" asked
Belly.

"Well, you see, when poor papa died," explained Mollie, as she put on a
little more speed, "he provided in his will that on my seventeenth
birthday I should have a certain sum of money to use just as I
pleased--within reason, of course.

"He didn't say what it was for, but he had suggested that I take a trip
to Europe. But I want to do that later, when I can better appreciate
what I see, so I asked mamma if I couldn't use the money for a car, and
she allowed me to. The result--you now behold," and she patted the
steering wheel.

"We do more than merely behold it," said Grace. "It was sweet of you to
ask us for a spin."

"Why wouldn't I, when Betty has been having us off on a cruise in her
motor boat?" replied Mollie. Then she cried: "Oh, dear! There's a dog!"
for one was in the road ahead.

"He can't bite us--up here," said Betty. "Unless you are afraid of your
tires."

"No, it isn't that, but I'm afraid I may run over him!"

However, the dog leaped away from the road, darted into an open gateway,
and from behind the safe vantage of the fence barked at the passing
auto.

"I don't mind you there," said Mollie, with a sigh of relief. "Oh, but
isn't this lovely!" and she inhaled deeply of the flower-scented air.
There had been a shower the night before, and the roads were in
excellent condition. Mollie had had the car about two weeks, and had
taken several lessons in driving. As the chauffeur had said, she had
proved an apt pupil, and now, being fully qualified, as her license
stated, to run it alone, she had, on this first occasion, invited her
friends for a run.

For several miles the girls rode along, enjoying to the utmost the
swift, silent and easy motion, and drinking in the sweet air. They
admired the views, too, for though they had been out with Mollie when
she was taking her lessons, they had been so much occupied with
watching her attempts to steer, and listening to the man's instructions,
that they had not fully appreciated the beauty of the country through
which they passed. And the country about Deepdale was beautiful.

"Are you going out Shadow Valley way?" asked Betty, as Mollie
successfully made a turn into another highway, off the main one.

"No, not this time, though we must go there some day. I thought we'd
motor to Farmington, and go home by way of Skillman."

"That's a nice way," said Grace. "Here, Mollie, open your mouth," and,
as her chum did so, Grace inserted a chocolate, for Mollie had not yet
enough confidence to take her hands from the steering wheel, except to
shift gears, with the right.

They were going along a well-shaded road now, the big maples on either
side meeting in an arch of green overhead. Some of the branches were so
low that care had to be taken in passing under them, as Mollie had the
top of the car up for protection.

As they approached one immense and ancient tree they saw a flutter of
white amid the branches near the ground.

"What's that?" cried Betty.

"Look out!" exclaimed Grace.

The white object--large and fluttering--toppled from the tree, almost in
front of the car, and with a little scream of fear Mollie gave the
steering wheel such a sudden twist that the auto swerved and nearly
upset. Across the road it shot on two wheels, and crashed into the
bushes and briars that lined the highway.

Instinctively Mollie jammed on the brake, and threw out the clutch, the
next instant shutting off the power, but so suddenly did she stop in the
excess of her zeal that Grace and Amy were thrown from their seats, and
Betty had to put out her hands to avoid hitting the wind shield.




CHAPTER II

A STRANGE GIRL


Mollie was the first to recover herself. Her position at the steering
wheel had given her an advantage, in that she had something to hold to,
and so was not tossed about as were her chums when the auto came to such
a sudden stop.

"Oh, dear!" Mollie exclaimed, ruefully. "Are any of you hurt?"

She gazed back at Grace and Amy, having assured herself by a look at
Betty beside her that the latter bore at least no visible injuries.

"I bumped my elbow--on the funny bone," said Grace.

"This is far from being funny," went on Mollie, half hysterical now.

"Stop it!" commanded Betty, getting control of her nerves, and then
taking the situation in hand, as she so often did. "No one is hurt, and
the car doesn't appear to be damaged, unless the stopping of the motor
indicates that."

"No, I shut it off," said Mollie. "Amy, how about you?"

"Oh, I'm all right. But what in the world happened?"

In concert they all looked back toward the big tree, which, to avoid
hitting something that fell from it, Mollie had steered away from so
suddenly, and with such unexpected results.

"Why--why, it's a--girl!" gasped Betty, as she saw a huddled figure
lying on the thick grass at the foot of the maple. "It's a girl,
Mollie!"

"Oh, my, I hope we didn't hit her!" gasped Mollie. "I'm all in a
tremble. Betty--I'm--I'm going to----"

"Don't you dare say faint!" commanded Betty. "Come, we must see what is
the matter. Poor thing!"

"Oh, if--if we struck her!" gasped Mollie.

"I don't see how we could have," declared Amy. "You steered out too
quickly."

"Yes, she did steer out quickly, all right," asserted Grace, rubbing her
tingling elbow. "Why, Amy, your forehead is all bruised!"

"Yes, my head hit the robe-rail I guess," said Amy. "But that isn't
anything. Oh, let's hurry to that poor girl."

Leaving the auto where it was, half-way through a patch of briars and
brambles, the four girls approached the quiet figure lying under the
tree. They looked up and down the road in case help would be needed,
but not a person or vehicle was in sight.

"Oh--oh! I'm--I'm afraid to--look," spoke Mollie, shrinking back, as
Betty bent over the figure of the strange girl. The latter's eyes were
closed, and her loosened hair was in a mass about her head--even tossed
as it was the girls could see there was a wonderful wealth of it. Betty
gently pushed aside the locks from the forehead, and, as she did so she
started back. Then bravely repressing her feelings she said:

"It's a cut, but it doesn't seem to be very deep."

"Oh, the blood--the blood!" murmured Mollie, putting her hands before
her eyes. "And--I--I did it!"

"Nonsense! Stop it!" cried Betty. "Perhaps you did not do it at all--it
may have happened in the fall."

"She is unconscious," said Grace.

"Yes, and we must get her to a doctor, or bring a doctor here as soon as
possible," spoke Betty. "I think we can get her to a doctor more
quickly. Will your machine run, Mollie? Can you operate it?"

"Oh, it will run all right. Nothing is broken, I'm sure of that. But
I----"

"You've just _got_ to run it," declared Betty, firmly, "even if it only
crawls. Now if we can find some water to bathe her head we can tell how
badly she is hurt. Girls, look for a spring. One of you bring me a lap
robe."

Thus Betty issued her orders, and while the girls are preparing to lend
aid to the injured stranger I will take a moment of your time--my new
readers--to explain briefly some facts about the characters of this
story.

In the first book, entitled, "The Outdoor Girls of Deepdale; Or, Camping
and Tramping for Fun and Health," I told how Mollie, Betty, Amy and
Grace, four girls of Deepdale, a town in the heart of New York State,
organized a little club for camping and tramping. They went on a tour of
about two hundred miles, stopping at night with friends or relatives,
and on that tramp they solved a queer mystery having to do with a five
hundred dollar bill--solved it very much to the satisfaction of a
certain young man.

In the second volume, called "The Outdoor Girls at Rainbow Lake; Or, the
Stirring Cruise of the Motor Boat _Gem_," I related what good times the
girls had when Betty's uncle gave her a fine gasoline craft. Stirring
times the girls had, too, when there was danger from a burning hay
barge; and jolly times when they took part in races and went to dances.
That Mollie's little sister Dodo was in distress because of a peculiar
accident, which involved Grace, and caused the loss of valuable papers,
detracted somewhat from the happiness of the girls for a time.

But in the end a "ghost" led to the finding of the missing documents,
and Dodo was cured, so that all came out right. Then had followed more
delightful times cruising and camping, and now, with the advent of fall,
and Mollie's touring car, more glorious times were in prospect. The
girls had not been long back from Rainbow Lake when Mollie received her
auto.

I might mention that Betty Nelson was the daughter of a wealthy carpet
manufacturer, with a large plant near Deepdale, while Mollie Billette
was one of three children, her mother being a widow. Little Paul and
Dodo I have already mentioned. Grace--the "Gibson girl," as she was
often called, had a peculiar longing for sweets, and not being stinted
as to pocket money--her father being a wealthy lawyer--she indulged her
taste rather too much, so some of her friends thought.

There was a mystery about poor Amy Stonington, for the details of which
I must refer my readers to the first book. Sufficient to say that since
a baby she had been cared for by her uncle and aunt, Mr. and Mrs. John
Stonington. Amy had lived in the West, and had been rescued from a
great flood when an infant. What became of her parents, or her brothers
or sisters--if she had any--no one seemed able to say. In a way this
mystery embittered Amy's life, but she was of too sweet and good a
disposition to allow it to make a difference with her friends.

The four girls had been chums since grammar school days, being now High
School students. In addition to the "inseparables," as they were often
called, my former readers will recall Will Ford, the brother of Grace;
his chum, Frank Haley, and another friend, Allen Washburn, now a young
lawyer, with whom Betty--but there, why should I give away Betty's
little secret?

Quite in contrast to these boys was Percy Falconer, a rather foppish
lad, who greatly admired Betty--as who did not? But as for Percy--Betty
did not care for him in the least. She was too fine a character to
permit herself to be really angry at him, but Betty and Percy never
could get along well.

"Dear Deepdale," as the girls alliteratively referred to it, was a
charming country town, nestling in a bend of the Argono River, which,
some miles below the village, widened out into Rainbow Lake. It was on
this lake that the girls had cruised, and had such fun, and Betty's
boat was now docked in the new house constructed for it near Mollie's
home. The girls lived within short distance of one another, and were
continually visiting, or calling back and forth. Where you found one you
would find the others, and their parents used to say they never knew
when to expect their daughters home to meals--for they were like one
family in respect to dining out.

And, as usual, this beautiful summer day found the girls together in the
auto, when the accident had thrown them into such consternation.

"Did you find any water?" called Betty, who had made a pillow of the lap
robe, and supported on it the head of the unconscious girl.

"Yes," answered Mollie, her hand trembling as she extended a collapsible
cup of the fluid she had dipped from a nearby spring, "I'll get more
when she takes that."

"I'm afraid I can't get her to take much of it," said Betty. "But I can
bathe the cut and see how large it is."

She tried to get a little water between the lips of the strange girl,
while Amy and Grace held her head up; Mollie, with another cup provided
by Betty, going off after more water.

"She took a little," whispered Grace.

The girl turned her head to one side as though to avoid drinking. Then
she muttered a few words.

"What did she say?" asked Amy.

"I couldn't understand it," answered Betty.

Again the stranger murmured something, and this time the girls caught:

"No, no! I will not go back to him! Anything but the life I have been
leading. Oh, why must I do it? Why?"

There was pathetic pleading in the words.

"There, my dear, you will be taken care of," spoke Betty, soothingly.
"We will take you to your friends."

"I--I have none! Oh, I can't go back to--him!"

Her eyes did not open, and she appeared to be in a delirium.

"Poor thing!" said Amy, softly. "Bathe her head, Betty."

"Yes, I think that will be better than trying to force her to drink."
Dipping her handkerchief in the water Betty wiped away the blood from
the cut. It was seen to be a small one.

"That ought not to make her unconscious," said Betty. "More likely she
has some additional injury; possibly a blow on some other part of her
head. Girls, did you ever see such glorious hair!" Betty caressed it.
Truly there was a mass of it, and it was of beautiful silkness and
softness. It was still partly bound up, but the autoists could easily
tell that it must reach almost to the ground when the girl stood up.

"What in the world could she have been doing up the tree?" asked Grace,
as Mollie came back with more water.

"It is the oddest thing," agreed Betty, bathing the stranger's face and
wrists.

"Are you sure we didn't hit her with the auto?" asked Mollie,
tremblingly.

"I am almost sure you did not," spoke Betty, positively. "As she started
to fall you steered out. She just toppled to the ground. See, there is
not a mark of dust on her dress, as there would be if the tires had
struck her."

"Yes, but perhaps the mud guard, or----"

"But her dress isn't torn or much disarranged. No, Mollie, the auto
never struck her, of that I'm sure. But possibly she fell on her head,
and the blow and shock stunned her. Oh, we must get her to a doctor!

"Come, girls," went on Betty, "we can lift her into the auto, I'm sure,
and take her to the nearest house. Then we'll go for a physician."

"Try to arouse her, first," suggested Mollie. "I can't bear to see
her--this way."

Betty used more water, and succeeded in getting some between the pale
lips of the girl, but to no purpose. She was limp and half senseless,
though she continued to moan and talk incoherently. Then the four girls
picked her up and carried her toward the stalled automobile.




CHAPTER III

STRANGELY MISSING


"Wait a minute," directed Betty, as she and her chums advanced, carrying
the unconscious girl. "We'll have to put her down here, where the grass
is soft."

"Why?" asked Amy, "she isn't heavy."

"No, but it will be better to get the auto out of the bushes, and into
the road before we put her in it. Something might go wrong, and jolt
her."

"That's so," agreed Mollie. "I think I can do it. Oh, but I'm nervous!"

"Shame on you!" cried Betty. "Be an outdoor girl--be your own brave
self, Mollie!"

"I will!" and there was determination in her voice. "I'm sure I can get
the car out all right!"

Mollie took her place at the wheel, pressed the starting button, and
then, with a glance backward to see which way to steer, she slipped in
the reverse gear, and let the clutch come into place. Slowly, amid a
tearing away of vines and bushes, the car regained the highway.

"Good!" cried Grace. "Now, how shall we put her in, Betty?" for the
"Little Captain," as she was often called (as Mollie was called "Billy")
was generally looked to for advice in emergencies like these.

"You and Amy must hold her between you on the rear seat," Betty
directed. "Support her all you can. Mollie will drive slowly."

"But perhaps we ought to get her to a doctor right away," spoke the
owner of the car.

"Getting her to a doctor would not make up for any injury caused by a
jolt," said practical Betty. "Besides, I do not think she can be
seriously hurt. Her hair is so very thick that she could stand a very
hard blow on the head. There are no other signs of injuries; but of
course there may be internal hurts. She did not fall far, those branches
were very close to the ground."

"What she can have been doing up the tree is a mystery," remarked Grace.

"Like the time when we found that five hundred dollar bill," added
Mollie.

"And the 'ghost' of Elm Island, and the missing papers in the saddle
bags," remarked Amy to Grace.

Mollie had brought her car to a stop, and alighted to help lift in the
unconscious girl. Between them Amy and Grace held her in the tonneau,
her head resting on Amy's shoulder, a damp handkerchief covering the cut
to keep any dirt from getting in it. Mollie again took her place at the
steering wheel, and when Betty had gotten in the girls started off with
their strange passenger.

"I couldn't imagine what it was, when I saw something white falling out
of the tree," spoke Mollie, driving along on high gear, but with the
motor well throttled down.

"Nor could I," added Betty. "And when you steered out so suddenly, I
thought surely we would crash into the stone fence, just beyond the
bushes."

"So did I, but I knew there was only one thing to do, and that was to
put on the brakes as hard as I could."

"And you did," said Grace. "I didn't know you could move so quickly,
Mollie."

"You can do many things when the emergency comes," replied Mollie, as
she turned out to avoid a rut in the road.

"This is better than a dozen lessons in the art of managing an auto,"
commented Betty. "Practical problems are what count--not theoretical
ones. Does she seem all right, Grace?" and she looked around at the
unconscious girl.

"Yes, and her breathing is better. I think she will soon come to."

"That's good. See, there's a house. We can take her in, and ask where
the nearest doctor is," and Betty pointed ahead.

Presently the auto stopped before it, and to a motherly-looking woman
who came out, Betty and the girls quickly explained what had happened.

"Of course! Bring the poor dear in!" the woman directed. "The men folks
are over in the far meadow salting the cows, or I'd send one of them for
Dr. Brown. He's most likely to be home too, now. He lives down the road
a piece--about a mile."

"I can go for him in the car, and bring him back," said Mollie.

"That's good. Bring the poor dear in the bedroom, and we'll look after
her until the doctor comes. I'll get the camphor bottle. That's good for
a faint."

The girl seemed to have again sunk into a stupor, as they carried her
in, and placed her on a comfortable lounge. Then the woman of the house
brought out a bottle of camphor, of generous size, and it was held to
the nostrils of the unconscious one.

The sufferer turned her head away from the pungent odor, and seemed to
be struggling against some unseen force. Again she seemed to revive
somewhat, and muttered:

"Oh, I can't! I can't! I don't want to go back to him! Anything but
that! I don't like--I can't bear that life!"

Her voice trailed off into a mere whisper.

"You had better hurry for the doctor," said Betty, and Mollie hastened
out to her car.

"I'll come with you," volunteered Grace, and Mollie was grateful.

"Suppose we take her into the bedroom," suggested the woman. "It's
cooler there. We can manage her. I'm real strong."

With her help it was no great task to get the girl on the bed. Her
garments were loosened so that she might be more comfortable, and more
camphor was used, but it seemed to have no effect.

"Suppose we go out and let her be by herself; we can't do anything
more," suggested the woman. "Besides, she needs all the air she can get.
That's always best for fainting folks. She may come to by herself, I'll
open the window and shutters," and she proceeded to do so. Then coming
out, and closing the door, they left the strange girl alone, Betty and
Amy taking turns telling how the affair had happened.

"Land's sakes! Fell out of a tree!" exclaimed the woman. "What in the
world do you s'pose she was doin' up in it?"

"We haven't the least idea," answered Betty.

"And who is this man she says she won't go back to?"

"We have even less idea--she has repeated that several times," spoke
Amy. "Oh, I do hope they find the doctor!"

"Dr. Brown is real good," was the woman's opinion. "He cured my
rheumatism, and Hetty Blake--she lives over on the Melford road--she had
jaundice something terrible--she was as yellow as saffron tea, and he
brought her around when old Dr. Wakefield give her up. Yes, Dr. Brown is
right smart."

Thus she entertained the girls with remarks on the country life around,
until Betty ventured to remark:

"I wonder if we oughtn't to look in on her?" motioning to the room where
they had left the girl.

"No, best let her be," said the woman--Mrs. Meckelburn, she had said her
name was.

"Hark!" exclaimed Amy a little later.

"It's an auto!" said Betty, going to the window.

She saw Mollie and Grace in the car, a young man, with a professional
air about him, at the steering wheel.

"That's Dr. Brown!" exclaimed Mrs. Meckelburn, "but I didn't know he
could drive one of them things."

"I guess Mollie got too nervous," explained Betty.

The doctor caught up his bag and hurried toward the house, followed by
Grace and Mollie.

"An accident!" he exclaimed in brisk tones, bowing to Betty and Amy, and
taking in the woman in his greeting. "Where is she?"

"In my bedroom, Dr. Brown," said Mrs. Meckelburn. "I do hope there's
nothing much the matter with the poor dear."

They clustered around as the physician pushed open the door. Then he
turned to them with a queer look on his face.

"Must be some mistake," he said. "There is no one here."

"No one there!" cried Betty in strange tones. "Why----"

She looked over his shoulder. There in the bed was the imprint of a
human form, but the girl herself had vanished!




CHAPTER IV

THE QUEER PEDDLER


For a moment after this surprising discovery had been made no one spoke.
Dr. Brown looked oddly from one girl to the other, and at Mrs.
Meckelburn.

"There is evidently some mystery here," he said. "I supposed there was
really some one here who needed my services?" and he glanced
questioningly at Mollie, who had summoned him.

"Oh, indeed there _was_," she said, quickly. "A girl fell out of a
tree----"

"Out of a tree!" exclaimed the doctor, and for a moment it seemed as
though he believed a joke had been attempted on him.

"Yes," went on Betty, taking up the story, "didn't Mollie tell you that?
She really fell from a tree as our auto passed, and at first we thought
we had struck her." Betty shot a glance of inquiry at Mollie.

"No, I didn't tell that part," confessed the owner of the new car. "I
was so flustrated, and I guess Grace didn't say anything either."

"No," answered the willowy one.

"Well, I'm here, at all events, but there is no patient," said the
doctor, with a smile.

"Oh, we'll pay you for your call!" exclaimed Betty, quickly taking out
her silver mesh bag. "How much----"

"No, no!" said Dr. Brown somewhat sharply, "you misunderstand me. I
never accept a fee in a simple accident case. What I meant about there
being no patient was that she has evidently gone away, possibly in a
delirium, and in that case we had better search for her, for she may be
badly hurt, or do herself some injury. You say she was in this room?"

"Yes," answered Mrs. Meckelburn.

"And you sat here in view of the door all the while?"

"Yes," spoke Betty. "She never came out of that door, I'm sure." Amy
said the same thing.

"Then the only other possible solution is that she got out of the
window," went on the physician, "for there is no other door from the
room. We must look outside," and he crossed the apartment to the
casement. It had been raised, and the shutters were open when the
unconscious girl had been left alone.

"The window is low--she could easily have dropped to the ground," said
Dr. Brown. "It is not more than four feet."

He leaned out to look at the ground underneath, and uttered an
exclamation.

"That is what she did!" he cried. "There are the marks of feet landing
heavily--small shoes--and unless some of _you_ young ladies have been
indulging in gymnastics."

"And see!" added Betty, standing beside the physician, "here are some of
her long hairs," and she picked some from the window sill. "Oh, she did
have the longest, most glorious hair!" and Betty sighed in memory, for
Betty loved long tresses and her own, while they became her wonderfully
well, were not very luxuriant.

"But I don't see how she could have gotten away, unconscious as she was,
and injured," said Grace, with a puzzled air.

"She may have regained consciousness," spoke Dr. Brown; "or, as I said,
she may have wandered off in a delirium. In that case we must try to
find her. Again, she may not have been as badly hurt as you supposed,
and also she may have simulated an injury hoping she would get a chance
to escape unobserved. Was there anything strange about her?"

"Yes, there was," admitted Betty, slowly, and she gave the details of
the accident, how, most unexpectedly the girl had toppled from the
tree, the subsequent swerving of the auto, and how, several times, the
girl had murmured something about not going back to a certain man.

"Hum!" mused Dr. Brown, "it is rather odd, I must admit. What do you
suppose she was doing in the tree?"

"We haven't been able to guess," confessed Amy; "perhaps she climbed up
to avoid a dog--we have met several dogs to-day."

"It's possible," Dr. Brown commented.

"And the tree was an easy one to climb," spoke Mollie. "I am not a very
good climber, but that tree offered temptations."

The doctor smiled.

"Well, let us make a search," he proposed. "Is there any special place
where a girl, who might wish to escape observation for some unknown
reason, could hide around here, Mrs. Meckelburn?"

"There's the barn."

"Very good, we will search there, and we may be able to trace her
footprints. Please do not any of you walk under the window, nor in a
line from it until we have made some observations. We will play a little
detective game," and he smiled frankly at the girls.

But if he had hoped anything from the clue of the footprints he was
doomed to disappointment for, though there were plain indications where
the girl had landed when she jumped from the window, the marks were soon
lost sight of on the harder ground a short distance from the house.

A search of the barn revealed no trace of her, and one of the farm
hands, coming to the house a little later, joined in the search. He
reported that there had been seen no hatless, injured--or apparently
injured--girl crossing the fields.

"Then she must have made a circle about the house, and gone out on the
road," suggested Betty. "She is probably far enough away from here by
this time, poor thing!"

"Perhaps we ought to search for her," spoke Mollie. "Of course it was
not our fault, since we are sure the car did not hit her; but perhaps it
scared her so that she fell."

"I should not blame myself if I were you," said the physician, kindly.
"It was evidently not your fault. You did all you could for the girl. If
she did not want further treatment that is her lookout. Of course, if
she wandered away in a delirium, that is another story, and perhaps it
would be well to search down the road. She did not pass us, or we would
have seen her, coming from my office along the main highway as we did,"
he said to Mollie. "A search in the opposite direction would be the only
feasible thing to conduct."

"Then let's do it!" cried Mollie. "And you please drive, Dr. Brown, I
haven't yet gotten over my nervousness."

Mrs. Meckelburn refused an invitation to go in the car, but the four
girls started off, Dr. Brown at the wheel. They went as far back as the
tree which was the scene of the accident and saw no trace of the girl.
Nor had any of several other autoists, or drivers of horse vehicles, to
whom they appealed, seen her.

"She has just disappeared--that's all," said Betty. "I wonder if we had
better notify the police?"

"I will attend to that for you," responded Dr. Brown, kindly. "There is
no need for you to be mixed up in this. Sometimes, with the best
intentions in the world, one gets unpleasant notoriety in these cases. I
will notify the authorities to be on the lookout for the girl, for her
own sake alone. Later, if there is need of you----"

He paused suggestively.

"We will leave you our addresses," said Betty, quickly. "Thank you for
looking after this for us."

"I am only too glad to be of service. Well, as long as there is no
patient to be found here, I had better return to those waiting for me at
my office."

"Go there in my car," proposed Mollie, quickly, "and then I will take
the wheel again. I am feeling better now."

"Such a fine car as this ought to make anyone feel fine! It is a
beauty!" and he seemed to caress the steering wheel. "I am getting a
small runabout," he went on, "and that is how I happen to know how to
drive. I learned some time ago."

They flashed past Mrs. Meckelburn's house, calling to her of their
failure, and saying that they would be back soon. A little later, having
left the physician at his home, they were again in the pleasant farm
house, sipping tea which their hostess had thoughtfully made.

"Isn't it queer?" observed Betty.

"A strange enough happening," Amy commented.

"Quite a mystery," asserted Grace.

"And really she was a pretty girl," declared Mollie. "I wish I had her
hair," and she sighed as Betty had done.

Grace strolled into the room where the girl had been, and half idly she
looked about it, as though in that way she might solve the mystery. A
piece of paper in one corner caught her eye and she picked it up.

"I found this in there," she said, coming out. "It has some writing on
it. Perhaps this is yours, Mrs. Meckelburn," and she held out the scrap.

"No, I'll guarantee there was not a piece of paper in that room when you
carried that girl in," said the farmer's wife. "I had just swept," and
she tossed her head in pardonable pride of her housework.

"What does it say?" asked Amy.

"It's evidently a piece torn from a letter," answered Grace, as she
accepted the paper from the woman, "and all I can make out are the
words--'not go to Shadow Valley even if'--and that's all there is to
it."

"How odd!" exclaimed Mollie. "Shadow Valley is not far from here."

"And the queer girl evidently dropped that paper," declared Betty,
examining the scrap. "Well, the mystery deepens, but I do not see that
we can do anything to solve it."

They talked it over for some time, but could come to no other
conclusion. Grace saved the scrap of paper, and soon, having bidden
good-bye to Mrs. Meckelburn, they were on their way again, with Mollie
at the wheel.

Gradually their nerves, upset by their adventure, resumed their poise
under the influence of the fresh air and sunshine, and the gloomy
atmosphere raised by the girl's accident, passed away.

They had made the turn into a road that would lead them to Deepdale when
they came in sight of a man standing in the road beside a small, and
rather gaudily painted wagon. He seemed to be looking in the dust for
something, and Mollie, seeing him, slowed up, remarking:

"Perhaps he has a break-down. Let's ask if we can help him."

The appearance of the man, in some ways, was enough to invite the
confidence of four girls, and in others was not. He had long, and very
white hair, fluffy and wavy, and was dressed in a shabby suit of black,
but his face had hard, cruel lines in it, as though he were in the habit
of imposing his will on others.

A look at his wagon showed the character of his trade, for it was
brilliantly lettered with such devices and mottoes as--"Bennington's
Hair is All His Own." "Use His Restorer and Be Likewise." Another was:
"Bennington's Restorer Really Restores."

"Have you lost something?" asked Mollie, bringing the car to a stop. He
looked up quickly, and smiled, but the smile only seemed to make his
face harder, instead of softening it.

"Yes, ladies," he said with a smirk and bow, taking off his broad
brimmed hat, and running his fingers through his hair, making it fluff
out more than ever, "I have lost a bolt out of part of my wagon, and I'm
afraid to go on lest I break down. It dropped somewhere in the dust, but
I can't find it."

"I have a supply of spare bolts in my tool box," spoke Mollie, "I'll
give you one, and that will save you looking any more."

"Thank you, lady. It will be just what I want." From the tool box on the
run board he soon selected a bolt that fitted his wagon.

"And now let me repay your kindness," he said. "I am, as you see, a
traveling peddler of hair tonic. May I present you with a bottle?" and
he offered Mollie one.

"No, thank you," and she laughed merrily. "It is something that I never
use."

"You all have fine hair," returned the peddler; "but at that it would be
all the better for Bennington's Restorer--I am Bennington--I make it
myself," and he bowed. "Won't you take it. I can guarantee it harmless."

"No, thank you just the same," repeated Mollie. "And you are entirely
welcome to the bolt. Good-bye," and she started her car.




CHAPTER V

PAUL AT THE WHEEL


The girls looked back at the old peddler as they swept on. He was
standing beside his horse, evidently mending some part of the harness.

"It was rather a dilapidated outfit," remarked Betty. "I don't see how
he can cover much ground in a day."

"Probably he doesn't," answered Mollie. "He may sleep in his wagon, eat
there--dining on bread and cheese or herring--and so reduce the high
cost of living. Then he may make a big profit on his hair restorer. Ugh!
The stuff! I could not bear to use it."

"Nor I; and yet he had nice hair."

"Perhaps he'd have that anyhow. He meant it well enough--offering us the
bottle."

"Yes," agreed Betty. "But it was just as well not to take it. My! what a
day of adventures this has been!"

"It has started in almost the way some days did when we were on our
tramp," spoke Grace, from the tonneau.

"Or when we were at the lake, trying not to be afraid of the 'ghost',"
added Amy. "Do you intend to do any more cruising this fall, Betty?"

"We may. Would you like it?"

"Would we?" cried Grace, "just ask us!"

"Now please wait," broke in Mollie. "I may have a little plan of my own
to propose soon."

"What is it?" begged Amy.

"I haven't it all worked out yet. I'll tell you as soon as I have. It
may offer us a chance for some fun----"

"And adventures?" asked Betty, quickly.

"And adventures," assented Mollie. "But one thing I do want, and that is
to have each of you girls run the car. I don't want to be selfish and
drive all the while."

"I would like to learn," said Betty, eagerly. "It's good of you to want
us to, Mollie."

"No, I have rather a selfish motive back of it. Sometimes I want to sit
in the tonneau and not have to worry about running over a dog----"

"Look out!" suddenly cried Betty, impulsively grasping Mollie's arm.
"That child!"

A little toddler had run from the yard of a house near the road, and was
scampering across the highway, his mother in close pursuit.

Quickly Mollie put on both brakes, and threw out the clutch, but there
was no need; for the child, with the perverseness of youth, had turned
and was running back toward the gate, evidently frightened by the
frantic tooting of the horn, the bulb of which Mollie pressed
spasmodically.

"Oh my! What a scare!" panted Mollie, as she slipped in low gear, and
started up again, without coming to a full stop.

"Well, I don't want to seem mean, but he is getting just what he
deserves," said Grace, looking back, "and that is--a spanking. Toddlers
must be made to learn the danger of rushing blindly across auto roads."

"I suppose so," agreed Mollie. "I could just see little Paul then," she
went on. "If I had hit that child----"

She did not finish, but they all knew what she meant.

Deepdale was reached without further incident, and the girls agreed that
Mollie had piloted her car wonderfully well for a beginner.

"Of course I've got lots to learn," she said to her chums, "but that
will come gradually, the demonstrator said. One learns, after a while,
to steer instinctively, and to do everything almost automatically--like
slowing down, applying the brakes and so on. Now you girls must come
over to-night, and we'll----"

"Talk!" interrupted Amy. "We've got lots to talk about."

"We always have," said Grace, looking in vain for a chocolate. The car
had stopped in front of her house, and Mollie had said she would leave
the other girls at their residences.

"Oh, don't bother," Betty had protested. "You must be tired, and it's
only a step."

"No, we must do this in style!" decided Mollie. "What is the use of a
motor car if one can't bring one's friends home in the proper mode?" And
she had her way.

The auto was to be kept in a public garage until Mrs. Billette could
have one built on her own premises, and, leaving her machine with the
man in charge, Mollie walked home.

That night her three chums called, and the talk was almost entirely
devoted to the strange girl and her queer disappearance.

In the days that followed the four inseparables took many rides out into
the beautiful country around Deepdale. True to her determination, Mollie
insisted on Betty, Amy and Grace taking at least a few lessons. Betty
was quick to learn, but Grace was not quite strong enough to handle the
wheel properly, and Amy was too timid. Still, either of the latter could
manage the car on a straight, level road, but Betty was the only one
who persisted enough to be able to get a license, which she one day took
out on Mollie's suggestion.

"And what is the something you were going to tell us?" asked Betty of
Mollie one day, as they were returning from a short run, Betty at the
wheel.

"Oh, it isn't quite ready yet," she said. "I'll tell you in plenty of
time to prepare for it, though. Mind your wheel, Bet, there are two cars
coming back of us, and I think they're going to pass us close."

"Well, let them look out, I'm on the right side of the road."

Two cars, scorching, did pass them, throwing up a cloud of dust that
caused the girls to gasp choke.

"Horrid creatures!" cried Grace. "My new cloak will be spoiled!" and she
dusted off the auto garment she had recently purchased.

"It is such as they who give all autoists a bad name," remarked Mollie.
"One rule of our club must be never to scorch."

"Our club?" asked Grace, wonderingly.

"There--I've told part of my secret!" exclaimed Mollie, in some
confusion. "I was going to suggest that, as we have a sort of informal
Camping and Tramping Club, and as there is a kind of motor boat club
feeling existing among us, we form an auto club."

"Let's!" proposed Amy. "Bet has the boat, you have the car, Mollie, but
poor Grace and I----"

"That doesn't make a bit of difference!" broke in Mollie. "You don't
have to have an auto to belong to this club. Just as when you get your
airship, Grace, we'll join your aero club; though you'll be the only one
with a flying machine."

"No flies for me!" said Grace, determinedly.

They reached Mollie's house rather early that afternoon, not having gone
far.

"Do come in for a cup of tea," urged Mollie. "It will refresh you all.
No, no, Paul!" she called to her brother, "you must not get in sister's
auto when she is not in it," for the little fellow had started to climb
up in the front seat as the girls strolled toward the house.

"Oo dot any tandy?" he asked, coming toward them.

"Oh dear, I wonder if I will always have to bribe you, Paul?" sighed
Mollie. "Grace, will you kindly oblige again? I guess I shall have to
appoint you official candy distributor."

"That would suit me," laughed Grace. "Here, Paul, and don't get that on
your suit--the chocolate is so sticky and messy in warm weather," and
Grace daintily removed, with the tip of her tongue, some brown spots
from the ends of her rosy fingers that had passed the candy to the
little boy.

The girls were sipping tea in the library, and talking, when there came
from out in front the sudden throbbing of an auto motor. Mollie leaped
up and rushed to the window. Then she screamed:

"Oh girls! Paul is in my car and it's running away with him! Oh, stop
him, some one!"

They all saw little Paul--a mite in the seat--holding bravely to the
steering wheel, and the car moving down the hill in front of the
Billette home.




CHAPTER VI

A TOUR PROPOSED


Betty was the first to rush from the house. She was closely followed by
Grace, who seemed to rise to the emergency in a manner not usual.

"Can we stop him? Can we stop him?" cried Mollie, over and over again,
as she clung to Amy and hurried on after Betty and Grace. "Oh, if mother
were to see him now!"

"Perhaps we can reach him in time," suggested Amy, consolingly. "Don't
worry, Mollie."

"Oh, whatever possessed him to do a thing like that? I have told him
time and again never to get into the car alone."

The four girls ran swiftly across the lawn--yes, swiftly, for no such
creations as "hobble skirts" hindered them. Fortunately Mrs. Billette,
whose French nature was easily excited had not seen the happening. Dodo
was out with the maid.

"Paul! Paul!" cried Mollie. "Put on the brake! Stop the car!"

"It doesn't seem to be going very fast," panted Betty, as she kept on
beside Grace.

"He hasn't thrown in the gear--that's one good thing," exclaimed Grace.
"He doesn't know how----"

She paused, for from the car came a laugh of childish delight, and a
change in the sound of the motor told that something new had occurred.

"He has the gear in now!" cried Betty.

She was running diagonally across the lawn, trying to intercept the car.
In her mind it was plain what had happened.

Paul had, with the impishness of childhood, climbed up in the auto. It
was a simple matter to even blunder on pushing the button that would set
the self-starter in operation. The car had been left standing on a level
bit of road, but, just ahead of it, was a rather steep slope. Mollie had
neglected to leave the emergency brake set, and when the motor started
there was vibration enough to send the car over the little space that
separated it from the slope. Then it simply rolled down. That was what
had happened first.

But now had entered a new complication.

It seemed that Paul had a tricycle, worked by foot pedals and hand
levers, and he was quite expert in its use. He had now put into
practice what had been told him about his toy, and had added his
observations of Mollie's operation of her car.

After starting the motor Paul had somehow managed to slip in the low
gear, and the marvel of it was that he knew enough to disengage the
clutch while he did this. Afterward he told how he had heard the
demonstrator impress many times on Mollie the need of doing so.

"Oh, we'll never get him now!" cried Mollie, as she realized that the
auto was moving under power now, and not merely by momentum. "Oh, Paul!"

The child was actually steering--the girls could see that, for the auto
swerved in and out, narrowly missing the curbstone, as he turned and
twisted the wheel too much.

"Paul! Paul!" cried his sister. "Stop it! Stop it!"

But Paul only laughed. He was having too much fun to want to stop.

It was hopeless for the girls to try to catch the auto now. They were
far behind it, but still Betty ran on. Several narrow escapes had Paul
on that perilous journey, and then in the nick of time he was saved from
what might have been a serious accident.

[Illustration: WILL KICKED HIS WHEEL FROM UNDER HIM AND WAS AT PAUL'S
SIDE.

_The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car_ _Page 51._]

Up the road was coming a racing car, going at high speed. The man,
crouched almost under the steering wheel, if he saw Mollie's car at all,
probably imagined that a motorist of experience was guiding it. But Paul
was on the wrong side of the road, and there was no telling at what
moment he might shift the course.

Then, riding like the wind, out from behind the racing car shot a
bicyclist. At the sight of him Mollie screamed:

"Will--Will Ford! Save Paul! He's in my car--there ahead of you!"

Will Ford was riding directly toward Paul. In an instant Grace's brother
had sensed the situation. Skillfully going around the racing car, which
had fortunately slackened speed as the driver evidently realized that
something was wrong, Will guided his wheel toward Mollie's auto.

Then he turned, so as to ride in the direction in which it was
advancing, with ever-increasing speed. Will gauged his progress to that
of the car, rode up alongside the run-board, and, in another instant,
kicked his wheel from under him and was at Paul's side. In another
second he had snapped off the power and applied the brakes.

"What for oo 'top me widing?" demanded Paul, rather indignantly.

Will's heart was beating fast, and he panted for breath, but he managed
to answer:

"Too bad, Paulie, but you haven't any license to drive a car, you know,
and a policeman might take you."

"Yes?"

"Sure. You mustn't do it again," and Will's voice was sufficiently
stern.

"All wight--I won't. But I tan wun a tar, all'e same; tan't I?"

Paul was evidently proud of what he had done.

"Yes, you can, but you mustn't--you mustn't! Do you understand?"

"Yes. Dot any tandy?"

Will laughed.

"No," he said, "but maybe the girls have. Here they come."

Half hysterical, Mollie and her chums came running up. They were all
rather "limp," as they confessed later.

"Oh, Paul, you naughty boy!" cried his sister. "Mamma will punish you
for this."

His big eyes opened wide.

"I ikes to run tar," he said, and his lip quivered.

"Don't be too harsh with him," murmured Grace.

"I can't help it--he must know how dangerous it is," insisted Mollie.
"You won't ever do it again; will you, Paul?"

"Nope. Dot any tandy?"

Their laughter relieved their strained feelings.

"Oh, Will, I can't thank you enough!" declared Mollie. "I thought I
would die when I saw that racing car coming toward him."

"I just saw him in time," exclaimed Will. "I had to act quickly, for
there was no telling when he'd try to cross the street."

Paul was contentedly chewing a candy Grace had produced and the little
crowd that had gathered, on seeing Will's act, began to disperse,
understanding what had happened. Then Mollie, assuming the wheel,
directed the car back to her house, taking the girls and Paul in it.
Will went back to get his bicycle and the excitement was over. But it
took some time for the girls to quiet down.

To impress on him the danger of what he had done, Mrs. Billette sent
Paul to bed. He cried and protested, but it was necessary, for he was
too daring a little chap.

Three days passed. The girls were at Mollie's house, having assembled in
answer to her telephone message.

"Well, it's all settled!" she exclaimed, as the trio came in together.

"What?" asked Betty.

"Our auto tour. That's what I've been working on. I wanted to plan a
nice route--one that would take in a good stretch of country, enable us
to see new places, and be comfortable. Now I have it all mapped out.
You'll come; won't you--all of you?" and she looked appealingly at her
chums.

"But what's it all about?" asked Grace, wonderingly.

"Why, since I have a car, we must get the best use out of it we can. So
why can't we four--and a chaperone, if we think we need one--go for a
tour, the same as when we walked--only this time we'll ride? We can make
five hundred, or a thousand, miles, if we choose, stopping over night in
different places. Won't it be fun?"

"Jolly!" cried Amy.

"Scrumptious!" was Betty's contribution.

"Mollie, you're a dear!" declared Grace, with a hug. "When can we go?"

"Soon now. I think----" A maid knocked at the door.

"Yes; what is it?" asked Mollie.

"If you please, Miss Billette, there's a gentleman to see you."

"A gentleman?"

"Yes, rather elderly, and he keeps making up verses, Miss. I'm not sure
about him. Will you see him?"

"Verses? Oh, it must be that dear old Mr. Lagg--the storekeeper!"
exclaimed Mollie. "Of course I'll see him. But, girls, what do you
imagine he wants?"




CHAPTER VII

MR. LAGG'S OFFER


With a broad smile on her face, the maid came back, escorting Mr. Lagg,
who, at the sight of the girls, bowed low, and declaimed:

          "I'm glad to see you,
            I hope we'll agree,
          That you are as happy
            Now to see me!"

"Good!" cried Betty, clapping her hands until the palms were rosy. "We
are indeed glad to see you."

"Of course," added Mollie. "How could you leave your store long enough
to run down here, Mr. Lagg?"

"Well, it _is_ running a risk," he answered, as he took a chair Amy set
out for him. "But I have important business down here, so I though I'd
call. I worked out that little verse on the way down," he confided to
the girls.

"You are extending your range," remarked Grace, who was languidly eating
chocolates. "That is, your poetry is getting more elaborate."

"It is indeed!" exclaimed Mr. Lagg, brightening up on hearing this
praise. "I am glad you noticed that. Yes, I am gradually getting it
better, and on a higher plane. That is what worried me about leaving my
store alone."

"Did you leave it all alone?" asked Betty, for the girls knew he did
quite a trade with the summer colonists of Rainbow Lake.

"Practically so," was the answer. "I have a boy I hire occasionally, but
he hasn't the least talent in the line of poetry, and I know my
customers will miss that. However, they will have to put up with it for
a few hours. I am going back as soon as I can.

"Perhaps," he added, cautiously, "I should never have worked up my
versifying talent; but, somehow, I just couldn't seem to help it. I
started in a modest way, just as I did in my store, and it seemed to
grow of itself. Now my customers have come to look for it, and I know if
Johnnie--that's the boy I spoke of as being left in charge--I know he'll
rhyme the wrong words--that is, if he attempts anything at all, which he
is likely to do. And nothing displeases a customer more than to listen
to wrong rhymes; don't you think so?" and he appealed to the chums.

"Of course," assented Mollie, with a look at the others to ask their
opinion as to what Mr. Lagg had in view, and what his object could be in
calling.

The storekeeper appeared to be nervous, and ill at ease, and it was
evident that he had attired himself with care for the trip.

He was obviously uncomfortable in his "Sunday-go-to-meetin'" suit, and a
stiff shirt and a stiffer collar did not add to his ease. But he stood
it manfully. Sitting on the edge of the chair he looked from one to the
other, twirling his hat.

"How--how is trade?" asked Mollie, feeling that she ought to say
something, but scarcely knowing what. She seemed to recall that this was
a way to engage a business man in conversation.

"Not what it should be," replied Mr. Lagg, with a smile. He seemed to
feel that he was making progress now. At least he was in his own
element. "Not what it should be. I miss you girls. When you used to run
in now and then for something in my line I did better. You were good
customers, and I always shaded the prices all I could, besides reciting
all my newest poetry as soon as I made it up. It isn't everyone I do
that for," he added. "Why, to some customers I never speak more than a
line or two in a whole year. But you girls--well, you're different. I
miss seeing the _Gem_ tied at my dock. There isn't a chance that you'll
go cruising again; is there?" he asked, eagerly.

          "Come, sail upon the bright blue lake,
           You, of my goods a choice may make.
           My prices you will find quite right,
           I'm open until eight at night."

"You always did treat us right, Mr. Lagg," laughed Betty, "but I don't
believe we'll do any more cruising--at least, not right away. We're
going in for land cruising now."

"Land cruising?"

"Yes, Mollie has an auto, and we were just planning a tour when you came
in."

"So, you see, unless you could arrange to have a sort of traveling
store, we couldn't patronize you very often," went on Mollie, wondering
why Mr. Lagg did not come to the point. He had evidently called with
some special object in view, and leaving his establishment during the
height of the season would seem to indicate that the object was not a
trivial one. "But we'll stop in whenever we're near you," Mollie
concluded.

"Thank you, Miss Billette. So you are going on an auto cruise; eh?"

"A tour, yes."

"Then that may fit in with what I have called about," said Mr. Lagg,
quickly. "Yes, it may be just the very best idea yet. Excuse me a moment
while I think," he said, and he closed his eyes. His head nodded two or
three times in a satisfied sort of way, and occasionally he murmured to
himself. The girls looked at one another, unable to fathom the meaning
of this conduct. Then Mr. Lagg whistled and suddenly exclaimed:

"I have it! You can solve this mystery, too!"

"Another mystery?" queried Grace, rather languidly, as she took a more
comfortable position on the divan. "We seem to be having a monopoly of
them."

"What is it, Mr. Lagg?" asked Mollie.

"Were you much afraid of that ghost on Elm Island?" he replied, by
asking another question.

"Not at all!" declared Betty, quickly.

"Especially as it was only--what it was," said Grace, with a laugh.

"Then I've got another one for you to solve," went on the poetical
grocer. "It's a haunted house!"

He beamed on the girls as though he had proposed the most delightful
sort of an affair.

"A--a haunted house!" faltered Amy.

"That's it--a regular haunted house--groans, slamming doors--queer
lights, and all that sort of thing."

"Where--where is it?" asked Betty.

"In Shadow Valley."

Instinctively the four girls started.

"Why, we--we were near there the other day," said Mollie. "We didn't see
any house that appeared to be haunted, though."

"No, and that's just it," went on Mr. Lagg. "You see it's only recently
been haunted, and that makes it all the worse."

"Tell us about it," suggested Betty. "Girls, this is getting
interesting. We must take this in on our tour."

"Don't!" pleaded Amy, the timid one, shivering in spite of herself.

"You know that old mansion, at the far end of the valley; don't you?"
asked Mr. Lagg. "At least, you must have heard about it."

"You mean Kenyon's Folly?" responded Mollie, who began to have a
glimmering of what was meant.

"Yes," answered the storekeeper. "Mr. Kenyon, who was once a
millionaire, built that mansion after ideas of his own. Everyone said
Shadow Valley--at least that part of it--was too gloomy and out of the
way to be a good place for a mansion like that, and the folks around
here said it was foolish. They called it Kenyon's Folly from the start,
though he named it Kenyon's Woodland Lodge, or some such fancy name as
that."

"And did it turn out as the people said?" asked Amy.

"Yes," answered Mr. Lagg. "From the very first his wife took a dislike
to the place. She said it was too gloomy, and in spite of a lot of
entertainments and parties--elaborate affairs they were, too--life there
was dreary. They had lots of company, but Shadow Valley seemed to cast a
gloom over the big mansion.

"Then Mr. Kenyon died, and some said it was partly due to grief over the
fact that his wife refused to live in the place. At any rate, he closed
it up, and went abroad, I believe, not living long after he started to
tour Europe.

"Then there was trouble over his will, his whole estate was thrown into
court, and the heirs fought and squabbled over the mansion, as well as
over the rest of his possessions. No one could get title to it, and the
place fell into neglect."

"Yes, it certainly does look lonesome and forlorn around there," said
Betty. "I was close to it about a year ago, but I never heard that it
was haunted."

"It wasn't until recently," said Mr. Lagg, "and that brings me to this
part of the story, and that's why I called on you. I might say that I
now own that haunted mansion."

"You own it!" cried Grace. All the girls were interested now, whatever
they had been before.

"Yes. After years of litigation the courts, last spring, ordered the
mansion sold. I saw a chance to get a bargain, and as I had some money
put away I bought in the property. I got it cheap, but I purchased it
through an agent so that no one, except a very few, know that I own it."

"What are you going to do--live in it?" asked Mollie.

"Ugh! Fancy living in a haunted house!" exclaimed Amy, looking over her
shoulder as though she felt a ghostly hand laid on it.

"No, I don't intend to live there," said Mr. Lagg. "I didn't buy it for
that. But I thought it would be a good investment, and I had an idea of
forming a company, and turning it into a hotel. By making some changes
the surroundings could be made less gloomy, and the place would pay.

"But before I could do that I got an offer from some doctors, who wanted
to establish a sort of sanitarium for the treatment of nervous diseases.
They saw the mansion, and decided it would be just the thing, being so
quiet, and all that."

"I should think it would be," murmured Grace.

"But where does the 'haunt' come in?" Betty wanted to know.

"I'm coming to that," spoke Mr. Lagg, being now too interested to quote
a couplet. "Matters were going on well, and I expected to close the
deal, and make a pretty penny, when the doctors said they couldn't take
the property, as it was haunted, and of course a haunted house, with
queer noises in the night, would never do as a home for nervous
invalids. I could see that myself."

"But how did they know it was haunted?" asked Mollie.

"It seems that some of them were inspecting the place late one
afternoon, a day or so ago," said the storekeeper, "when a shower came
up, and they had to stay inside until it was over, which was after dark.
It was then they heard the queer groans, and saw strange lights, and
felt cold draughts of wind."

"Bur-r-r-r-r!" shivered Amy. "This is getting on my nerves."

"I guess it got on the nerves of the doctors," said Mr. Lagg, ruefully,
"for they called off the deal, and said they could not take the house
unless I would get rid of the haunt. Of course I laughed, and made an
investigation."

"And you didn't find anything?" put in Betty, quickly.

"Excuse me, Miss, but I did," replied Mr. Lagg, quietly.

"You did! What?"

"Just what the doctors said--queer groanings--strange lights--like
brimstone, and the same sort of smell--sulphur. I--I didn't stay long, I
don't mind admitting that."

For a moment the girls were silent, and then Mollie spoke.

"Did it ever occur to you, Mr. Lagg," she asked, "that those doctors
might be playing a trick on you to get you to part with the property
cheap? A haunted house isn't the best sort of real estate, you know; but
haunts and ghosts can easily be imitated, and those doctors might be up
to some such trick as that."

"I did think of that," went on the storekeeper, "and that is why I came
to you."

"You came to us!" chorused the girls.

"Yes. You see, you solved the mystery of the ghost of Elm Island, and I
don't see why you can't do the same thing for Kenyon's Folly."

"But that ghost, on the island--was a natural one," said Grace. "And the
boys helped us to discover what it was."

"Very well," said Mr. Lagg, calmly. "I've no objection to the boys
helping you in this case. In fact, it might be better. But what I want
to know is, could you--and would you--dare try to solve the ghostly
mystery?"

The girls looked at one another. Amy was shaking her head in the
negative. Betty and Mollie seemed interested, for they were born
leaders, Betty especially. Grace reached for another chocolate, always a
source of inspiration for her.

"Of course I'm not asking you to give up your time and go to a lot of
trouble for nothing," resumed Mr. Lagg, quickly. "I am willing to pay
you well. So I make you this offer. If you can discover what makes those
ghostly sounds and manifestations, and can show me a way to get rid of
them, if they are natural, which I am sure they are, why, I'll pay you a
good sum. I can afford to, for I can then sell the mansion to the
sanitarium doctors. Will you try it?"

"But if those doctors are interested in depreciating the value of the
property, by making it appear haunted, they would have a good object in
preventing us from finding out what causes the queer noises and lights,"
said Mollie.

"Exactly," agreed Mr. Lagg, "but you girls were smart enough to solve
that five hundred dollar mystery, and the mystery on Elm Island, so I
have hopes that you can help me out in this. That is why I called. Will
you help me?"

"Shall we, girls?" asked Mollie.




CHAPTER VII

IN THE MUD


Mr. Lagg looked hopefully from one to the other of the Outdoor Girls.
Clearly he was very much in earnest over his strange offer, and he saw
nothing out of the ordinary in it. But it must be admitted that it is
not every day four girls are asked to take a motor tour and solve the
mystery of a ghost-haunted house. Betty and her chums evidently realized
that.

Betty finally spoke.

"Well," she said, slowly, "we would like to do you a favor, Mr. Lagg,
and we wouldn't want you to pay us----"

"I won't have you undertake it on any other basis," he interrupted. "If
you solve that mystery for me it will be a big favor, and worth paying
for. I might make up a verse about that part of it, but I won't take
your time. But please consider it."

"If we did it at all," spoke Mollie, "we would do it as a favor to you,
for you have been very kind to us. But I don't like to promise to
undertake it. I'm sure mamma would object."

"I wouldn't want to stay all night in a haunted house," declared Amy,
with a shudder, whereat Grace cried:

"Don't do that! You'll have us all nervous before we know it."

"You might not have to stay there all night," said Mr. Lagg, "though of
course I know that is customary in solving mysteries of this kind. You
might be able to tell what it was without staying there long. I wouldn't
want you to run any risks, you know."

"Why don't you undertake it yourself?" asked Betty.

"I can't spare the time. I am needed at my store. That boy is sure to
wrap up the wrong kind of tea or sugar, and my customers are very
particular. And as for the poetry end of the business, he is no good at
that at all. No, I can't spare the time."

"But if you think those doctors have an object in making the mansion
appear haunted," spoke Grace, "why do you not go to the authorities and
complain? Surely they would do something for you."

"I thought of that," said Mr. Lagg, simply, "but you know what the
police are about ghosts. They would only laugh at me, and do nothing.
Besides, if these doctors are doing it, they are sharp enough to cover
their tracks well. I would have no chance. But they would never suspect
you girls, and they might betray themselves. Come now, will you look
into this for me?"

He was very much in earnest, and Mollie, who had at first been inclined
to laugh at the ghost theory, began to think that at least Mr. Lagg had
some basis for his alarm. If after all his work in getting the property,
that no one had cared for so long, it was to become useless on his
hands, he was to be pitied, for he had labored hard to accumulate his
savings.

Still the girls did not want to be rash, to run into danger, or
undertake something that would get them unpleasantly talked about, for
in no place other than in a country town is there so much gossip.

"You needn't answer me right away," went on the storekeeper. "Take a
little time and think it over. Speak to your folks about it, and tell
the boys, if you like. But if these ghosts, whatever they are, don't get
out of that place soon, I'll lose all the money I put in it."

"Did those doctors hint at taking it at a lower figure than you offered
it for?" asked Betty.

"No, they haven't yet. If that is their game they will wait a little
longer, I think," spoke Mr. Lagg. "But don't be in a hurry to decide
now. Think it over. I'll go now, for I must get back to my store.

          "I'm glad to have seen you,
             One and all.
           When up my way,
             Please make a call."

He bowed to them all in turn, and took his leave, the girls excitedly
talking about the object of his visit, as he went out.

"Did you ever hear of such a thing?" asked Grace.

"The haunted mansion of Shadow Valley," remarked Mollie. "It reads like
a book title."

"Maybe we could make a story of it," suggested Amy, whose taste ran
somewhat to literature, and who had won several prizes in school essay
work.

"We'd better solve the mystery first," said practical Betty, "then we'll
know what sort of a book to make. I wonder if we ought to take this up?"
and she gazed half-doubtfully, half-suggestingly, at her chums.

"Not right away, at any rate!" exclaimed Mollie. "Let's talk about our
motor tour. I'm just dying to get off on that. Afterward we can
consider Mr. Lagg's offer. Poor man, he seemed really worried! I'd like
to help him if we could."

"So would I!" declared Betty.

The girls alternated their talk between the proposed tour and the
haunted mansion. The latter was left in abeyance, but they tentatively
decided to take a long auto trip, as soon as they could arrange for a
chaperone to go with them on such occasions as they would stay over
night at hotels, while other nights were to be spent at the homes of
relatives or friends. In a way it would be a duplication of their
camping and tramping trip, except that they would cover a wider range of
country, and be more comfortable.

"And I only hope we have as much fun!" exclaimed Mollie. "Now, girls,
we've talked enough. Let's go for a run. I telephoned to have my car
brought here, and----"

"Here it is--quite marvelous!" interrupted Betty, as the large and
handsome auto drew up outside, in charge of a man from the garage.

Auto veils, bonnets, goggles and gowns were soon donned, Mollie's chums
having come partly prepared for a trip, and soon, with Mollie at the
wheel, they were riding down the pleasant main street of Deepdale.

"Hey there! Take us along!" came a voice as they turned off the main
thoroughfare into a smaller road that led to the farming country beyond.

"It's Will and Frank," said Grace, as she observed the two boys.

"And there comes Allen," added Amy.

"Now, Betty, maybe you'll talk more," for the Little Captain had been
rather silent.

"Shall we take them?" asked Mollie, as she noted Betty's blushing
cheeks. "There is plenty of room." Her car would seat seven with
comfort.

"Take us along!" pleaded Will. "We'll buy the chocolates, girls."

"Oh, let him come," petitioned Grace, for her candy stock had again run
low.

"That's all she thinks of!" declared Betty. "But I have no objections."

"Especially when Allen is around," taunted Mollie, as she slowed up her
car near the sidewalk.

"Come on, fellows!" exulted Will. "We're going to have a ride in the joy
wagon."

"The chocolates," Grace reminded him, coolly, as he started to get in
between her and Amy.

"We'll buy them when we get out a ways," he promised.

"Get them at Lee's," she stipulated. "His are best."

"Did you ever see such a sister!" cried Will. "She has no heart! Very
well, run us around to Lee's, Mollie. I'll get the candy if it--breaks
me," and he began searching through his pockets, picking up bits of
change on the way.

The other boys took their seats, and soon the machine was moving again,
a stop being made for the chocolates. Grace insisted on going into the
store with her brother.

"If I didn't he'd palm off the twenty-cent kind on us, and tell us they
were Lee's best," she said to her chums.

"You eat so many of them that you can't tell the difference--your taste
is jaded," taunted Will.

"Can't I, though?" replied Grace. "Well, I'm not going to give you the
chance to try me. We'll have the best!"

Again they were under way, Grace passing around the box of
confectionery.

"Shall we tell the boys about Mr. Lagg?" asked Betty of Mollie, beside
whom she rode on the front seat, the boys and other girls being in the
tonneau.

"Just as you like."

"Then I think I will." The story was soon told.

"Was he in earnest?" demanded Will.

"He seemed so."

"Then let's have a try at laying the ghost!" proposed Frank. "I wonder
what the union rates are for ridding haunted houses of the haunt? We
must have union wages."

"Of course," agreed Will. "Girls, will you transfer any rights you may
have as ghost-layers to us, if we pay you a commission?"

"We'll think about it," murmured Betty.

"I believe it's all foolishness!" declared Grace. "Maybe Mr. Lagg was
only making fun of us."

"No, there _is_ something in it," said Allen Washburn, quietly.

"How do you know?" demanded Will, quickly.

"Because I acted as Mr. Lagg's representative in some legal matters,"
replied the young law student, who was allowed to do some practice. "I
know that he owns the old mansion, and I heard, indirectly, that he was
having trouble disposing of it to the sanitarium doctors. Of course I
can't say as to the ghost, but there is some hitch over carrying out the
transaction. If you girls could solve the mystery, providing there is
one, I know you would be doing Mr. Lagg a service."

"Then let's do it!" cried impulsive Mollie.

"And we'll help," added Will.

Half-jokingly they talked about it as they motored over the pleasant
road. There had been a heavy shower the night before and the main
highways were in excellent condition, though a trifle muddy in spots. Of
course some of the less-used country roads would be well-nigh
impassable.

It was while crossing one of these roads, on a hard macadam highway,
that the girls and boys saw, stuck in the mud of the poorer path, a
peddler's wagon. The bony horse was doing its best to move the vehicle,
which had sunk down in a hole, one wheel being imbedded in the mud to
the hub.

"Why, it's that hair-tonic man!" exclaimed Mollie, as she slowed down to
avoid a rut in the road.

"No, his wagon is all painted with gaudy signs," said Betty. "That's a
boy driving that wagon. Why--why!" she exclaimed, as she caught sight of
the lad, "it's the same boy who took home the little lost girl for
us--the same one who told us about the man with the five hundred dollar
bill. It's Jimmie Martin!"




CHAPTER IX

IN SHADOW VALLEY


The boy, who was endeavoring--and by gentle urging, be it said to his
credit--to get the horse to pull the wagon out of the mud-hole, looked
up on hearing his name spoken by Betty. At first he did not recognize
the girls, and his face plainly showed this.

"Don't you know us?" asked Mollie, as she brought her car to a stop.

The boy shook his head. Then, as he looked from face to face, a light
came over his own.

"Oh, yes!" he cried. "You found the little lost child when you were on
your walking tour, and turned her over to me."

"Exactly," agreed Betty. "But you seem to be in trouble, Jimmie," for
the bony horse had given over the attempt to move the mired wagon and
was patiently resting between the shafts, awaiting developments.

"I am in trouble," Jimmie admitted, frankly.

"Have you given up your business, and are you working for some one
else?" Grace wanted to know. "Why have you the wagon? The last time you
carried your own pack."

"I'm still my own boss," he replied, with a smile. "I am trying for a
larger trade, that's all. I got the chance to buy this outfit cheap, and
I took it. I guess I got it too cheap," he added, ruefully, "for this
horse isn't strong enough to pull me out of this mud-hole. I shouldn't
have come this way."

He looked down at the soft, miry road. The one wheel seemed to be
sinking deeper and deeper into the clay, and the others showed a
propensity to follow its example.

"Where did you come from?" asked Will, whose sister had explained to him
and the other boys under what circumstances they first met the young
peddler.

"Up Shadow Valley way," was the answer, and instinctively the auto party
of boys and girls started, and looked at one another.

"Er--was trade good up that way?" asked Frank.

"Oh, not very. You see, there are not enough folks living there. So I
thought I'd take a short cut over to Limeburg. I generally do pretty
well there. But I guess I'd have done better to have gone the long way.
I'm stuck for fair. Go 'long there, Stamp!" he called to the horse.
"See if you can move the boat."

"Stamp? Is that his name?" asked Betty.

"I just christened him that, Miss," replied Jimmie, with a smile.

"Why?" asked Grace, who was always the last one to see a joke.

"Because, Miss, he's--stuck!" was the answer, and the others, who had
anticipated this, laughed at poor Grace.

"I don't care!" she said. "I was thinking of something else then."

"Well, I guess I'll have to stay here until this mud dries up," went on
Jimmie, "or I might feed up Stamp until he is strong enough to pull me
out. Only that would take too long, I'm afraid. He's been kept on a diet
of carpet tacks, lately, to judge by the many fine points about him," he
added, whimsically.

Will alighted from the auto, and, going as far as the edge of the muddy
road, looked critically at the stalled wagon. Then he asked:

"Have you a long rope?"

"Not a very long one," said the boy peddler, "but I have one that may
do. I'll get it," and he delved in the rear of his vehicle.

"What's the game?" asked Frank.

"I was going to see if we couldn't pull him out of the hole," replied
Will. "If the rope is long enough to reach from his wagon to the auto,
and the rope holds, and his wagon doesn't pull apart with the strain, we
can do it."

"Oh, I hope we can!" cried Mollie. "We must try."

Jimmie produced the rope, and, tossing one end of it to Will, proved
that it was long enough. It looked sufficiently strong, too.

"Now, Mollie, if you'll turn around, and back down as near as you can,
we'll see what we can do," proposed Will.

While the car was being manipulated to the proper position, Will tied
some knots in the rope.

"Fasten this end to the middle of the whiffle-tree," he called to
Jimmie, tossing the loop to him. "In that way you won't have to unhitch
the horse, nor get out in the mud yourself."

"Oh, I won't mind that--if I can get out of this hole."

"Might as well take it as easy as you can," went on Will. "That's the
ticket. Be sure your knots are firm."

"Yes, don't tie granny ones the way I did the night the _Gem_ got
adrift," murmured Grace.

The rope was soon fast to the wagon and backed-up auto.

"Go ahead slowly," cautioned Will. "We don't know what will give way
first, the horse or the wagon. Take it easy, Mollie."

Slowly the auto started. There came a strain on the rope. There was a
creaking to the old vehicle, and then it slowly began to emerge from the
mud. The old horse, who had almost gone to sleep, roused up at this
strange activity, and was literally forced to stir out of his tracks. In
a few seconds the wagon was on the firm road, the auto having pulled it
in a diagonal direction from the mud-hole.

"Thanks, ever so much!" exclaimed Jimmie. "I'm sure I can't thank you
enough. If ever you get stuck----"

"You'll pull us out!" finished Mollie.

"Not until Stamp is better able to do it," the boy answered with a
laugh. "But I'll do all I can."

"And so you didn't like Shadow Valley?" asked Will, as the boy made
ready to proceed on his way.

"No, it's too gloomy for me. Hardly anyone lives there."

"Did you see that big mansion up there?" asked Grace.

"The one that rich man built, you mean? Yes, I passed near it a while
ago. It's only about three miles from here. The grounds are pretty well
in ruins now, but the house is good."

"See anything strange about it?" asked Will.

"Strange? What do you mean?"

"Oh, well, I mean--er--any tramps in it--or anything like that?"

"No, not a thing," and Jimmie looked curiously at his questioner. "Well,
I must be going. No more muddy roads for me!"

The auto party took their places again, Betty succeeding Mollie at the
wheel, and Will being promised a chance later. Then they started off.

"Where are you going?" asked Grace, as Betty turned up a road on which
they seldom journeyed. "This doesn't take us anywhere in particular."

"It goes to Shadow Valley," answered Betty.

"Are--are you going there?" gasped Amy.

"Just to get a glimpse of it," was the reply. "Surely you're not
afraid--in broad daylight."

"And with us along?" demanded Will, heroically. "Shame!"

"Oh, well----" began Amy, but she did not finish.

"This side road leads right into the valley," said Mollie, a little
later.

"Then we'll take it," decided Betty, and she swung the car about. A
little later they were looking down from a height into the strange
valley.

One end--that nearest them--was laid out in a number of small farms, on
which were substantial houses. But the other end, where "Kenyon's Folly"
had been built, was in the narrower part, and was almost deserted as
regards residences. This section of the valley was narrower, the
hills--almost mountains--rose high on either side, hemming it in. This
produced deep shadows early and late in the day, and gave the valley its
name.

"There's the ghost house!" said Will, in a low voice, pointing toward a
mansion, perched on one of the side hills, on a natural ledge. "I can
see the ghost now!"

"Oh!" screamed Amy.

At that moment from the dense underbrush near the auto there came a loud
cry, and some one fairly tumbled down a little declivity into the
road--the figure of an old man with long, white hair.




CHAPTER X

OFF ON THE TOUR


Grace and Amy were in each other's arms. Betty admitted afterward that
she wished she had some one to lean on, but she gripped the steering
wheel until her knuckles went white with the strain. Mollie clutched the
sides of the seat in a grip of something like despair. The boys looked
wonderingly at one another, and then at the strange figure that had
tumbled out of the bushes.

"Oh, it's the hair-tonic peddler!" exclaimed Mollie a moment later, as
she got a glimpse of the man. He had risen and was brushing the dust off
his rusty black suit.

"The who?" asked Will.

"A man who sells hair-tonic," explained Betty in a low voice, for the
stranger was looking at them now.

"At your service, ladies and gentlemen!" exclaimed the proprietor of
Bennington's Hair-Tonic. "I see you remember me," and he smirked at the
girls--that hard, and rather cruel, look never leaving his face, even
when he smiled.

"Oh, yes, we remember you," replied Betty, coolly. She now had control
of her nerves.

"Don't talk to him too much," advised Allen, in a low voice. "You never
can tell who these fellows are, nor what their game is."

"Ob, he's harmless," replied Betty, in a return whisper. "We met him on
the road one day, and supplied a bolt that he had lost from his wagon."

"All the same," insisted Will, "he might----"

He was interrupted by Mollie, who asked:

"Where is your wagon?"

"I left it in a secure place," replied the hair tonic man.

"What were you doing up there?" asked Allen, nodding in the direction
whence the man had taken his tumble.

"That was an accident," replied Mr. Bennington, who continued to dust
his clothes, which seemed to have accumulated considerable of the dirt
of the road. "I was up on the hillside gathering the herbs I use in my
tonic, when my foot slipped. I heard the auto coming, and I was afraid I
might roll under it. That is why I yelled."

"Oh," said Mollie, faintly. "Well, you got on our nerves, Mr.
Bennington."

"I am sorry I have nothing for nerves," and the fellow bowed, rather
mockingly, it seemed. "I am a specialist in hair. If you would like any
of my tonic--something to make your locks like mine," and he shook his
own with an air of pride, "why," he resumed, "I am at your service!"
Again he bowed.

"I don't think we care for any," answered Allen, who seemed to have, in
common with the other boys, taken a dislike to the peddler. "Suppose we
go on, Betty."

"Very well," replied the Little Captain at the wheel, as she advanced
the gasoline lever. The motor had not ceased running.

"Then I can't sell you any of my Restorer?" called Mr. Bennington, as
Betty slowly let in the clutch.

"No," answered Allen, and he glanced back in time to note the fellow
making an elaborate bow, his white locks falling about his head in a
"shower."

"I don't like him," Frank announced, when they were out of the man's
hearing.

"Nor I," added Will.

"Why not? He seems harmless enough," spoke Amy. "Poor man! he probably
has a hard time making a living."

"Don't you believe it!" declared Will. "To my way of thinking, he's a
faker. He looked plump and well-fed enough. I warrant you he has no lack
of good food. Those fellows put about ten cents worth of alcohol in a
bottle, a little perfume and some water, and sell it for a dollar as
hair-tonic."

"Well, really some of that stuff must be awful!" exclaimed Grace. "I'm
glad I never use it."

"You never have to--nature was good to you," murmured Frank in her ear,
whereat Grace blushed.

Mollie glanced back toward Shadow Valley. The gloom over it was
increasing, and at the far end could just be discerned the deserted
mansion--the remnant of a rich man's folly. About that, too, the shadows
seemed to gather, dark and foreboding.

"Ugh! That place gives me the creeps!" Mollie muttered. And against the
dusky background of the valley and the old mansion she beheld the figure
of the rather mysterious peddler. His white locks stood out in strange
contrast to the surrounding darkness, and his black clothes.

"It certainly looks as though it might be haunted," agreed Betty. "Poor
Mr. Lagg! I'm afraid he will never get the money he expects out of that
place. It would never do for a sanitarium for nervous wrecks."

"Oh, I don't know," answered Will. "I've been close to it several times,
and, I think, by cutting down some of the trees that keep out the
sunlight, a good view could be had. Then the place would not be half so
depressing. But of course if it gets a reputation of being haunted that
will settle it as far as people with weak nerves are concerned. Are you
girls going to take up Lagg's offer?"

"We haven't thought of it lately," replied Grace.

"Too busy arranging for our grand tour," added Mollie.

"Well, we fellows may decide to take it up, and get the reward--it would
come in handy for vacation money," said Will.

The car was now descending a slope, and soon Shadow Valley was out of
sight, as was the strange old mansion. The girls breathed easier, and
perhaps the boys did also, for, though nothing had actually occurred,
the reputation of the place, and the sudden and startling appearance of
the old man, had given them all a thrill.

"This is the second time some one has tumbled out almost under our
auto," said Mollie, as they turned on a road toward Deepdale. "The
third time may not be so lucky for them--or for us."

"That's so," agreed Amy. "The first was that girl who disappeared so
mysteriously. I wonder what became of her?"

"So do I," spoke Grace.

"And if she ever went back to the mysterious 'him' of whom she talked?"
added Betty.

"Perhaps it was her--sweetheart--and they had a quarrel," suggested
Will.

"Is it silly to--have a sweetheart?" asked Allen, with a glance at
Betty, whose face was then turned toward him. He saw the flush on her
cheeks deepen.

"Of course!" declared Mollie.

"No, but it's silly to quarrel with them," said Will. "Isn't it, girls?
Especially when they bring you--chocolates."

"It's all some of them are good for!" declared Grace, with a toss of her
head.

"Children--children!" said Amy, pleadingly. "Don't be naughty."

"All right--little mother!" promised Will.

"But, seriously, I often think of that girl," went on Mollie. "She
seemed very nice, and in such trouble."

"Funny about being up a tree, though," said Will, drily. "Maybe she was
one of the original tree-dwellers, and reverted to her ancient days."

"You are hopeless," murmured Grace. "Don't encourage him, girls."

"If they don't I'll pine away and go into a gradual decline," said Will,
languishingly, trying, unsuccessfully, to put his head on Amy's
shoulder.

"Stop it!" she commanded.

"I have it!" cried Frank. "That girl wasn't--well, not to put too fine a
point upon it--she wasn't just right in her head. That's why she climbed
a tree."

"Poor girl!" spoke Amy. "I hope she found some friends, at any rate,"
and Amy thought of the mystery surrounding her own life, and how
fortunate she had been to find such a good home with Mr. and Mrs.
Stonington.

Talking of the recent happening, laughing and joking, the young people
were soon in Deepdale, and a little later had separated to their several
homes.

As Mollie had said, the details of the tour were now practically
settled. Mollie's cousin, Mrs. Jane Mackson, had arranged to accompany
the girls as chaperone, and on such times as she could not be with them
they were to stop over night at the homes of friends or relatives.

They did not arrange for any definite rules about their trips. It was to
be a pleasure jaunt, and at times they would cover more ground than
others. Nor were any fixed dates set as to when they would be at certain
places. As Mollie aptly expressed it:

"It's so much nicer not to know exactly what you are going to do, and
then if anything comes up to make you change your plans you're not
disappointed. We're going to be as care-free as we can."

And so the tour was laid out. The girls would take with them suit-cases
with sufficient change of raiment to do them until other things could be
forwarded from their homes to various designated points. Occasionally
they would take a run back to Deepdale to renew necessaries.

The farthest point they would reach would be to visit an aunt of
Mollie's in Midvale, about two hundred miles from Deepdale. But this
would come at the end of the tour.

"Well, I think we are all ready to start!" exclaimed Mollie one morning,
when the three girls, and her cousin, had assembled at her house. "Have
you everything you need?"

"Not nearly--but all I can carry," announced Betty.

"No, no, Dodo! Mustn't climb in the car!" admonished Mollie, for the
little girl was endeavoring to do so.

"Dot any tandy?" demanded Paul, possibly as the price of not following
his sister's example.

"Ess--us ikes tandy!" cried Dodo, climbing down.

"Oh, Grace, will you kindly oblige again!" begged Mollie, as she took
her place at the wheel.

"Certainly," said Grace, sweetly.

The girls were in the car.

"All aboard--we're off!" cried Mollie, and she pressed the self-starter
button.




CHAPTER XI

A TRACE OF THE GIRL


"When are you coming back for us?"

"Why don't you take us with you? You may need us to help put on a tire."

"They'll send for us in a day or so!"

Thus called Will, Frank and Allen, who had assembled at Mollie's house
to watch their girl friends start on the auto tour.

"If we need you we'll send for you," promised Mollie, as she let slip
the clutch pedal. "But I don't believe we shall."

"What--need us--or send for us?" asked Allen, with a laugh. "That is an
ambiguous statement."

"I'm not on the witness stand!" retorted Mollie to the young law
student.

"Now do be careful; won't you, girls?" pleaded Cousin Jane, a trifle
nervously, as the car gathered speed.

"Oh, we're always careful," said Mollie. "Don't fuss, Cousin Jane, or
you won't have a good time." Mollie was too kind to add that neither
would her friends have much pleasure, and perhaps Mrs. Mackson realized
this, for, though she would clutch nervously at the side of the seat
whenever the car jolted or lurched, she said nothing more in the way of
caution.

"Brin us some tandy!" called Dodo after the retreating auto.

"Brin 'ots of it!" added Paul.

"Your true disciples, Grace," remarked Amy.

"You can't make me angry," said Grace in cool tones, as she munched a
chocolate.

"What's this?" asked Amy, as she felt some long, round, hard object on
the floor of the tonneau, amid many others of various sizes and shapes.
"It feels like a--bomb."

"It's my bottle," said Grace, with an assumption of dignity. "Leave it
alone, please."

"Your bottle?" asked Betty, curiously, turning around.

"Yes. I filled it with cold chocolate--it's a vacuum bottle, you
know--and will keep its contents cold a long time. I thought we might be
thirsty."

"As if we wouldn't pass a drug store, or some place where we could get a
drink," objected Mollie.

"Oh, well, you'll want some sooner or later," predicted Grace. "Those
chicken sandwiches are very salty, and the olives----"

"They always make me want a drink," said Amy. "I'm real glad you brought
it, Grace. You and I love each other; don't we?"

"Cupboard love!" scoffed Mollie. "Never mind, Grace, we'll forgive you."

The boys waved their final farewells, the twins joining in, and some of
the relatives of the girls, who had gathered to see them off, shook
handkerchiefs or hands.

"Under way at last!" exclaimed Betty, as the car gathered speed. "What
did you say our stopping place would be for to-night, Mollie?"

"Freedenburg. There's a nice home-like hotel there, and we can get
adjoining rooms. I wrote on and engaged them last week."

"That will be nice. Oh, isn't it glorious!"

They were on the main street of Deepdale now, having to pass through the
town to get to the road that led to Freedenburg, which was about
seventy-five miles away. They planned to make the town by night.

The main street had been sprinkled to lay the dust, and there were
little puddles of water here and there. It was impossible to avoid all
of them, and Mollie went into a big one at a crossing. The big-tired
wheel threw some muddy spray and it went far enough to land on the
highly-polished shoes of a youth who had paused to let the car pass.

"I beg your pardon!" called out Mollie, for she was going very slowly.

"Well, of all the careless----" began the youth in angry tones.

"Oh, it's Percy Falconer!" gasped Grace. "See Betty."

"I don't want to see!" she answered sharply.

Percy heard his name, and his manner changed as he recognized the girls.

"I beg your pardon!" he cried, as though the accident had been his
fault. "It doesn't matter in the least. I was going to get another
shine, anyhow. I wish----"

But his further words were lost as the car moved on.

"That was nice of him," said Mollie. "I did spoil his polish, but when
he saw Betty he was as nice as pie, though he looked as if he'd like to
eat me up a moment before. Betty, you are to be congratulated."

"Don't speak to me of him. I--I----"

"Count ten, slowly," spoke Amy in such mirth-provoking tones that they
all laughed. Percy gazed blankly after the retreating car, and then made
his way to a boot-blacking stand.

The girls were soon outside the town, bowling along a pleasant country
road. The day was perfect, and, as Grace said, they could not have had a
better one for their start had it been "made to order." They had plenty
of lunch with them, and planned to stop in some convenient spot at noon
and eat.

"Oh, I forgot those cheese-crackers!" suddenly cried Betty, when they
had gone several miles. "I had them on the hall table, and I'm sure I
forgot to put them in."

"Look and see," suggested Mollie.

"No, they're not here," went on Betty, regretfully, after a search.
"We're all so fond of them."

"Mr. Lagg keeps them," suggested Grace. "It wouldn't be much out of our
way to go to his store."

"We will!" decided Mollie, and she made a turn at the next crossing. Mr.
Lagg was glad to see them, as he always was. He bowed and smiled as he
came out to the car.

          "Ladies, you have come, I see,
          To say you'll lay that ghost for me.

"At least I hope so," went on the poetical grocer, with a laugh. "Say
you'll undertake that job," he pleaded. "I've tried to get those doctors
to take the place, ghost and all, but they won't, and I'll have it on
my hands if I don't look out."

"We can't promise," spoke Mollie. "Maybe the boys--Grace's brother and
his chums--will undertake it, Mr. Lagg. If they don't, when we come back
from our tour, we'll consider it once more."

"Well, I'll hold you to that!" he declared. "This is getting serious
with me."

"Have the doctors made any other move?" asked Betty.

"No, not yet. They asked me if I could guarantee that there would be no
queer disturbances, and of course I couldn't so they said they'd have to
wait. But they're dickering for another place, and may take it. I wish
there was no such things as ghosts."

"There aren't!" declared Mollie, decidedly.

"Then how do you account for what happened in the old mansion?" asked
Mr. Lagg.

"Imagination," said Betty.

The storekeeper shook his head.

"A fellow like Pete Skillinger, or some of the fishermen around here,
might imagine," he admitted, "but not those scientific doctors. They
certainly saw, and heard, something they couldn't explain. They sure
did!"

"Did you make any inquiries to be sure they were not doing this
themselves?" asked Mollie. "I've heard of such cases."

"No, these doctors are all well-known men, and have good reputations,"
said Mr. Lagg, with another puzzled shake of his head. "They wouldn't do
such a thing. I don't doubt but what this haunting business can be
explained; but how? That's the question. How? I can't solve it--I
haven't time--daren't leave my store. Now you girls are smart and brave.
The ghost of Elm Island didn't bother you, so why should this one?"

"Oh, well, we'll think about it," promised Mollie. "Now what we most
need are cheese crackers--and not ghostly ones, either, Mr. Lagg."

"You shall have the best in stock."

Then, his mind being turned in another channel he recited this:

          "Cheese crackers I have, large and small
          Enough for one--enough for all.
          I've sardines and pickles too,
          My aim is always to please you."

"And you generally hit what you aim at," laughed Grace. "I think I'll
have a few more chocolates," she added, as she inspected her box. "These
won't last all day, and I know yours are good, Mr. Lagg."

"I'll bring them out," he said, as he hurried into the store.

The girls bought a few other things they found they had overlooked in
starting off, and once more they got under way.

"Don't forget the ghost!" pleaded Mr. Lagg, as he waved farewell. "Get
rid of it for me."

"Poor old man--he really means it," said Amy. "I wonder what can be in
that house?"

"Bats and rats, most likely," said "Cousin Jane," as they all called
her. "Bats and rats!"

"Worse than spooks--when they get in your hair," spoke Mollie. "Give me
a nice clean ghost, that waltzes around in a two-step. Oh, girls, I hope
we can go to a dance of two on our tour."

"Some are planned for us," said Mollie.

They kept on, enjoying the ride to the utmost. Just before noon they got
a puncture, and voted not to attend to it until after lunch, which they
ate near a road-side spring, under a great oak tree. And then the Fates
were kind to them. For, as they were laboriously jacking up the car to
take off the tire, a lone chauffeur, in a big car, came along and kindly
offered to do the work for them.

The girls gladly accepted, and watched him carefully, for though they
had once or twice before changed a shoe, they were not skillful at it.
Mollie offered the man some change, but he declined with a laugh and
reddened under his tan.

"Then do have some lunch!" said Betty, understanding his embarrassment.

"And chocolates," added Grace, generously.

"I will," he said. "It's hard work driving a big car like mine--all
alone."

"Oh, is it _your_ car?" asked Mollie. "I thought----" and as the young
man nodded she understood why he had refused the money. He was the
owner.

"Oh, girls!" exclaimed Mollie, when he had gone, "and to think that I
wanted to pay him--maybe he's a millionaire."

"You meant it all right," said Betty. "And really he looked like a
professional chauffeur. He might have taken the money, and let us think
so. I read a story once where a man did that, and fell in love with a
girl, and----"

"Spare us the details," begged Grace.

Again the girls were off, and without further accident, save that when
Betty was driving she narrowly missed running over a persistent barking
dog. They reached Freedenburg, and went to the hotel, leaving the auto
at a public garage near by.

"Oh, for a good bath, and a hot cup of tea!" exclaimed Mollie, for the
latter part of the ride had been rather hot and dusty. "Then we'll feel
like new girls."

The services of a maid were at their disposal in their rooms, and they
were soon making themselves fresh for the dinner that was shortly to be
served. As Mollie let down her long hair the maid uttered an
exclamation:

"Excuse me, Miss, for remarking it," she said, "but you have lovely
hair."

"We all think so," added Betty.

"It isn't so very nice," spoke Mollie. "I am hoping it will get
thicker."

"It's lovely!" the maid insisted. "I haven't seen any as nice--not since
a strange girl stopped here one night some time ago, and I helped her do
hers up. Hers was nearly to the floor when she stood up. And it was just
the color of yours. She had a scar on her forehead, I remember--a recent
one, and I had to be careful of it as I combed her hair."

"A cut?" asked Betty, looking at her friends curiously.

"Yes, Miss. She said she had fallen out of a tree."

"A tree!" The four girls uttered this together.

"Why, yes," and the maid seemed surprised. "I suppose she was
playing--she said she was very fond of sports--and she was just the age
to enjoy them."

"Yes, yes!" exclaimed Betty eagerly. "Did she have--I mean what was her
name--or could you describe her to us? We have a reason for asking."

"Why, I don't recall that she gave me her name," said the maid slowly,
"but I can tell you how she looked."

Then, to the surprise of Betty and her chums, the hotel maid gave a good
description of the girl they had seen fall out of the tree some time
before--the girl who had so strangely disappeared when they went after
aid for her.

"It's the same one!" cried Betty, and then she told the maid of the
coincidence.




CHAPTER XII

A DISABLED CAR


"Where did she go?"

"Didn't she leave her name--or anything?"

"Did she seem all right?"

"Did she tell why she was in the tree?"

With these questions the girls fairly bombarded the mystified maid when
they had established, beyond all reasonable doubt, that the girl they
had aided and the one at the hotel were one and the same.

"I don't know where she went," the maid finally managed to say, "and I
don't know her name. It may be on the register, though."

"We'll look!" declared Betty. "But did you learn anything about her?"

"Nothing much. She seemed all right, as far as her health was concerned,
but she did not seem happy. The cut on her head was nothing. I asked her
if the fall from the tree had hurt her, and she said not much."

"Did she say why she climbed up it?" asked Amy.

"No, Miss, she did not."

"And she didn't tell you anything about herself?" It was Grace who asked
this.

"No, only in a general way. I thought, from what she said, Miss, that
she had seen trouble, and was trying to get away from it. She was well
dressed, and had some money. She let fall that she was traveling about,
trying to find some friends she had lost track of. There was some
mystery about her, of that I'm certain."

"I am too," declared Mollie. "Poor girl!"

"I'm going to look at the register," said Betty. "That may give us a
clue, as the boys say."

The girls dressed for dinner, and then visited the hotel office. The
maid fortunately had a good memory, and could tell the date of the
girl's stay. The register of that day contained several names, but the
clerk recalled the incident of the girl applying for a room. This hotel
made a speciality of catering to women patrons.

"That's her name," said the young man, pointing to one in the book.
"Carrie Norton."

"And it doesn't say where she is from," remarked Amy.

"I asked her about that," spoke the clerk, "and she said it did not
matter. So I did not insist."

"Carrie Norton," mused Mollie, as the girls went into the dining room.
"Well, I hope she has found her friends. Poor girl!"

They talked and speculated about her, but that was all they could do.
They could arrive at no conclusion. It was plain that she had not been
as badly hurt as they had feared, and, after leaving the farm house,
must have gone to some other place of shelter. She must have also
changed her garments, for the dress the maid described was not the one
she wore at the time of the accident.

She had left the hotel, after stopping there one night, the maid said,
and had left no directions for any mail to be forwarded, nor had she
given any clue to where she was going.

"She seems to have come into our lives in a most mysterious way," said
Mollie, "and then to have vanished. We get a glimpse of her, as it were,
and again she vanishes. I wonder if we will ever solve the mystery?"

"Perhaps she is--the ghost of the haunted mansion of Shadow Valley,"
suggested Betty.

"What an idea!" cried Grace. "Don't be so--shivery!"

"Well, she is as mysterious as ghosts are supposed to be," Betty went
on. "I wonder when we will meet her again?"

"When we do, we must take care that she does not escape without telling
us more about herself," said Amy. "Not that we can insist, but we ought
to know for our own satisfaction."

"I think so, too," added Mollie. "She is getting on my nerves."

"Besides, we might be able to help her," spoke Grace. "It is dreadful to
think of a nice girl like that going the country, friendless and alone.
She may need just the aid we could give her."

All the conclusion the girls could come to was that the girl, after
leaving the farm house, had somehow managed to find those who were able
to look after her. Then had come an interim, which was a blank as far as
the girls were concerned. Then came the hotel episode, and--another
blank.

"It's like one of those missing-piece puzzles," complained Grace. "We'll
never get it straightened out."

"We may," said Betty, more hopefully.

That evening, with Cousin Jane to accompany them, they went to a pretty
little play, enjoying it very much. Morning saw them on the road again,
and they stopped the next night at the house of a distant relative of
Betty's mother.

Then, for a time, the good luck the girls had had left them. There came
a spell of rain that lasted two days, and they remained in the house of
Mrs. Nelson's relative--rather miserable days they were, too, for there
was little to occupy them. But all things come to an end finally, and
the bad weather was no exception.

The sun came out, the roads dried up, and one pleasant morning saw the
outdoor girls again in the car, speeding onward. Their objective point
was Wendell City, and to reach this they had to make a detour that would
take them through a picturesque part of the country.

In fact it was so picturesque, and there were so many fine views, that
Mollie stopped the car oftener than she meant to, and in consequence
they were far behind their schedule when it began to grow dusk.

"Something is the matter with the car," said Mollie, after a climb of a
steep hill, which had to be taken on second gear.

"Oh, don't say that!" begged Grace. "We've got a good way to go, yet."

"Oh, it isn't anything serious, I think," said Mollie. "But one of the
cylinders seems to be 'missing.' There, hear it!" she exclaimed. The
girls were expert enough to detect the "miss," now. It was unmistakable.

The auto faltered on top of the hill. Then it went down and on the level
seemed to be all right again. The girls were more hopeful, until the
next hill was reached. There the car nearly stalled. But the summit was
reached, and there appeared in view a long, easy, downward slope.

And then, with a sigh and a groan of protest--which manifestations had
been accumulating of late, the car suddenly ceased working, and came to
a stop. The power was gone.

"Oh dear!" cried Mollie, for it was getting late, and the road was a
lonely one. "What shall we do?"

"Get out and fix it, of course," answered practical Betty.

"Look--look where we are," whispered Grace, clutching the arm of Mollie.

"Where? Don't be so nervous. Where are we?"

"Near the rear entrance to Shadow Valley," spoke Grace, in an awe-struck
voice.




CHAPTER XIII

THE STORM


Silence followed an exclamation that came from the lips of each of the
girls--an involuntary cry from each one, brought out by the words of
Grace.

"Shadow Valley!" murmured Mollie.

"And the--the----" it was Betty who began this, it being her evident
intention to make a remark about the haunted house. Then her usual good
sense came to her rescue, and she refrained. There was pressure enough
now on the nerves of her chums, she reasoned.

"Well, what of it?" she asked in a voice meant to be cheerful, and Betty
was an adept at simulation under necessity.

"Don't--don't you understand?" faltered Grace, in a low voice--a tone
calculated to add to the tenseness of the situation, rather than to
relieve it.

"I understand that our car has balked for some reason or other," said
Betty in brisk, business-like tones, "and we have to fix it. If we
don't we are likely to be caught in a thunder storm. So get out, girls,
and let's hunt for trouble. Grace, if you have any chocolates left you
might offer them as a prize for the one who first discovers the
difficulty--and why the motor won't mote. Cousin Jane will be
the--stake-holder is the proper term, I believe."

"The idea!" cried Mollie. "That's only When there is betting. We don't
do anything like that."

"I meant to say prize-holder then!" admitted Betty, with a laugh.

"Well, there's no use discussing it--I haven't a chocolate left," sighed
Grace. "But oh, do you realize our position?"

"I do indeed, and that's why I say we must make this car go," went on
Betty. "Come," and she got out, followed by Mollie. "It seems hard lines
to get a thunder storm after all the rain we've had, but it is
threatening. Let's get busy."

"I think that suggestion very practical," said Mrs. Mackson. "Girls, you
had better do as Betty says and try to find out what is the matter with
the car. I don't know anything about such things or I'd help. If a
hairpin will be of any use I have an extra paper of them with me."

"Hairpins! Oh, dear!" laughed Amy half hysterically. "A hairpin to mend
a broken auto!"

"I have known one to be of service on a motor boat," spoke Betty. "I
bent it in the shape of a spring, and used it on a valve in the _Gem_."

"I'm afraid there's more than that the matter here," spoke Mollie, as
she raised the hood of her car. "That one cylinder must have affected
the others, in some way."

"Gracious!" exclaimed Amy, "I didn't know auto diseases were catching in
that way. We must be careful, girls."

"It's getting darker," observed Betty. "We must be quick Mollie, if
we're to get to shelter before the storm breaks."

It was growing dark and gloomy, and though it was not yet seven o'clock
the lowering clouds had added to the dusk of approaching night.
Occasionally, in the distance, could be heard the low rumbling of
thunder.

"Oh dear!" exclaimed Grace. "We are in for a drenching, that's sure."

"Not necessarily!" said Mollie, a bit sharply. "I'd remind you that my
car has a top, and we can put it up."

"That's all right," spoke Betty, soothingly, for she noted that Mollie's
temper might get the best of her under the stress of the trouble.
"Let's look at the engine first. Shall I light the lamps, Mollie?"

"Yes, do. I didn't think of them. Light the oil ones as well as switch
on the electrics. We may need both, and I am not sure of that storage
battery. The last place I had it looked at the man said it would need
re-charging soon."

While Betty, with the aid of Grace, set the oil and electric head lamps
aglow, and saw that the tail light was also in service, Mollie was
peering at the motor.

"Just push the self-starter button," she directed Betty after a moment,
during which she had primed the cylinders with gasoline, and changed the
adjustment of the carburetor slightly. She had really made quite a study
of the troubles that might beset a motor, and the garage man had added
some further instructions.

Mollie watched while Betty pushed the lever, and set the electric
starter in motion, but when the gasoline and spark levers were set at
the proper places, the motor did not respond, the fly wheel merely
revolving under the impulse of the starter.

"What is it?" asked Grace. "Can you tell what is the matter?"

"No, I can't!" and Mollie spoke shortly. "I'll tell you as soon as I've
found out," she said. "Please don't make me nervous, Grace--dear."
Mollie added the last as a polite concession.

"Nervous! If anyone is more nervous than I am, I'd like to know it,"
murmured Grace. "Oh, how I wish I had a chocolate!" and she hurriedly
sought among her possessions, but in vain.

"I wonder how we happened to get here--at the entrance to Shadow
Valley?" queried Amy. "I thought we were far away from it."

"We are far enough from the other end," replied Grace. "I guess Mollie
didn't know this road took us here, or she wouldn't have come. We are
nearer--nearer the--oh, you know what I mean, Amy."

"Yes, you mean--that house!"

"That's it. I--I hate to mention it. But we are nearer to it than ever
since--since Mr. Lagg told us about the--the trouble there. I wish we
were--back home. Gracious--what's that?" and she jumped nervously,
clutching Amy's arm.

"Only thunder--a sharper clap than usual--don't be a goose!" said Betty,
sharply. "Shall I try it again, Mollie?" for Mollie was still inspecting
the motor by the light of one of the oil lamps held over it by Cousin
Jane, while Betty was at the steering wheel, manipulating the levers.

"Yes, try it once more. I can't seem to see what is the matter. The
ignition seems to be all right, but when you throw in the gas, and set
the spark, the motor doesn't take it up. Try again."

Again Betty tried, but the fly wheel would only revolve, and that was
all.

"It's no use!" sighed Mollie. "I'll have to have a garage man look at
it. Probably it's some simple little thing. That's generally the
way--it's the little things of life that make so much trouble. You can
fight a big thing better."

"But where will you find a garage man around here--and at this time of
night?" asked Amy, for it was really night now, with the clouds adding
to the darkness.

"I don't know, I'm sure," and Mollie's voice did not have its usual
pleasant note. "Maybe one will come along in an airship," she added a
bit sarcastically.

"Mollie," spoke Betty soothingly.

"I don't care--I don't like foolish questions asked of me when I'm
worried."

"I didn't mean to bother you," said Amy gently.

"Oh, I know it!" and Mollie's voice trembled. "It was horribly mean of
me to answer you as I did. I beg your pardon, but I am _so_ bothered!
Isn't it mean to have things go wrong this way, and at such an
inconvenient time and place?"

"Never mind," spoke Betty, laughing. "To-morrow we will only think this
was fun. And now I suggest that we go down the road a bit, and look for
a garage. It's true that this isn't a main highway, but nowadays even
the country blacksmiths are calling themselves auto repairers. We may
come upon one unexpectedly, and if his shop is closed he may live near
enough so that we can get him out here. Let's try, anyhow."

"Betty, dear, you're such a comfort!" exclaimed Mollie, putting her arms
around her chum. "Come, we'll go on a hunting expedition."

"All of us?" asked Grace.

"No, there's no need for all of us to go," said Betty. "Mollie and I
will take a lantern--one of the oil ones--and walk down the road. The
rest of you can stay here."

"And I think you'd better put the top up while we are gone," suggested
Mollie. "It may rain suddenly, and with the top and the side curtains
and wind-shield in front, we can at least keep dry until morning."

"What! Stay here all night?" cried Amy.

"Why not? Where else can we go?"

"I'll not stay," declared Grace. "I'll walk anywhere--even in the
rain--to get away from--this place," and she could not repress a shudder
as she looked back over her shoulder at the entrance to gloomy Shadow
Valley.

Betty again took her position at the wheel--why, she hardly knew. Mollie
had closed the bonnet over the motor, evidently giving up trying to
discover the trouble. Idly Betty pushed on the button and lever of the
self-starter, and then she exclaimed:

"I have it!"

"What! Have you found the trouble?" asked Mollie, excitedly.

"No, but I have a plan. We can run the car down to the foot of the
slope. It's more sheltered there--bigger trees, you know--and we'll be
that much nearer where we want to go."

"But how can you make the car go--when it won't?" asked Mollie.

"The self-starter! It's guaranteed to run the car under electric power
for nearly a mile, without the motor being operated. All we'll have to
do will be to set the starter going--that turns the fly wheel, you know.
Then we can put in low gear, slip in the clutch, just as if the motor
was in operation, and get the car to the top of the hill. We're really
at the top now, for it's level here. But we can get it to the edge of
the downward slope, and let it coast. Then, on the next level, we can
do the same thing again. In that way I am almost sure we can make over a
mile."

"Good!" cried Mollie. "You should have a car instead of me, Bet, my
dear!"

"Oh, I don't take any credit for that think! I just recalled an
advertisement I had read about self-starters. Nearly all of them say the
starters alone will propel the car for some distance. Let's try it,
anyhow."

They all felt better on hearing this, and Amy even laughed. She started
to get into the car, when Betty said:

"Perhaps it will be just as well to wait about getting in until the car
is at the beginning of the slope. The less weight in the auto the easier
it will move. Mollie, do you want to try the scheme?"

"No, you do it--you thought of it. We'll walk along with you if you get
it to go."

Betty soon demonstrated that she could get the auto to move, and slowly
but surely it rolled along until it had started down a long, gentle
slope. Then Betty shut off the electric motor, which was run by a
storage battery, and applied the brakes.

"Get in now," she directed, and a little later the party was coasting
down hill, the foot brake serving to prevent too great speed.

"So far--so good!" cried Betty, when they had reached the level. "Now to
see how far the starter will carry us."

As she spoke a more vivid flash of lightning, and a rumbling crash of
thunder, made all the girls, and even Cousin Jane, jump.

"We're going to get it!" predicted Grace, with a shiver.

Betty again repeated her operation with the starter. The car went
forward slowly, and the girls were very hopeful, and then suddenly the
auto came to a stop with a sort of whining groan, and the electric
lights went out.

"Oh, dear! What's happened now?" asked Amy.

"The storage battery has given out," said Mollie. "I was afraid it
would. Now, girls, we'll either have to stay here in the auto, or else
walk--and be caught in the rain."

"Well, let's get the top up, at all events," suggested Betty. "Then
we'll be sure of some shelter."

It began to rain, gently at first, even while they were struggling with
the rather refractory top, in the dim light of the two oil lamps. But
they managed to get it in place. Then, as they were fastening the side
curtains, the storm burst in all its fury, with a suddenness that was
almost terrifying.

Grace and Amy, who were trying to fasten a curtain on the side of the
auto whence the wind came, screamed and let go of the flap. In an
instant, so powerful was the wind, it had ripped off the curtain,
sending it scurrying away in the blackness of the night, that was torn
and pierced by frequent flashes of lightning.

"Now we have done it!" cried Grace. "Oh, Mollie, I'm so sorry!"

"Never mind! Don't talk about that now. Get on your raincoats, girls, or
you'll be drenched!" and, fastening the last strap of her curtain,
Mollie donned her garment--the girls and Mrs. Mackson carrying them in a
seat locker that Mollie had utilized for this purpose.

But the rain came in at the place where there was no side curtain,
sweeping over them all. The wind blew fiercely, and the auto swayed in
the blast. Miserable indeed was the plight of the Outdoor Girls. They
were possibly having just a little too much of out doors.




CHAPTER XIV

AT THE HAUNTED HOUSE


"Girls, I can't stand this any longer!" complained Mollie, as the storm
raged about and above them.

"What are you going to do?" asked Betty.

"For one thing, let's try to take one of the curtains from the side
where the wind doesn't blow so hard, and fasten it on the place where
that one blew away. That will help some."

They tried, but it was hard work. The curtains fastened with straps
above and below, being a new kind, and not very satisfactory, as Mollie
declared then and there. Nor were the girls successful, for the wind
whipped and blew the curtain about so that it was impossible to put it
up. Thus there were two openings now--one on either side of the
auto--and rain came in both.

"This is dreadful!" cried Mollie. "Girls, I'm sure you'll never forgive
me for getting you into this scrape."

"It wasn't your fault," said Betty. "You couldn't tell that the motor
was going to give out. Besides, what if we are wet? It isn't very cold,
and we'll get dry some time. Oh, but that was a heavy one!" she cried,
pressing her hands over her ears as a tremendous peal of thunder
followed closely after a vivid flash.

"We must do something!" cried Mollie. "This is unbearable."

"But what are you going to do?" asked Grace. "It looks to me as though
we'd just have to bear it."

"We can get out and walk until we find some kind of shelter," said
Mollie. "There must be some sort of house around here. This place isn't
a desert. And even walking in the rain and mud is better than staying
here, all cramped up, and drenched. Who will come?"

"I guess we all will, if one of us goes," spoke Betty. "But, oh, Mollie,
are you sure that's the best thing to do?"

"Why not? What else can we do?"

"Well, of course if this storm would let up it would be easier going out
then. We might wait a while."

"It doesn't show any signs of letting up," retorted Mollie. "It acts to
me like an all-night rain, and the longer we wait the worse off we'll
be, and the less chance we'll have of finding any one up if we do locate
a house."

"Oh, for a nice dry house, and a good hot cup of chocolate!" sighed
Grace.

"Heartless creature--to even dream of such things!" cried Amy. "Oh dear!
What do you think? A stream of water is going down my back."

"And both my shoulders are soaking wet," added Mrs. Mackson. "But it
might be worse, girls!"

"I don't very well see how," remarked Mollie. "Well, shall we try it?"

The others hesitated a moment. As they waited and listened to the
whining of the wind, the swish of the rain and the angry muttering of
the thunder, and saw the vivid lightning, it was no wonder they did not
want to decide hurriedly to go out in that out burst of the elements.
But it was also trying on the nerves to stay in the stalled auto,
exposed as it was by the lack of side curtains.

"Oh, let's try it!" suggested Betty in sheer desperation. "We can't any
more than get drenched, and our rain coats will be some protection. Come
on, girls."

They had the two oil lanterns in the car with them, and carrying them
they now emerged from their shelter.

"Gracious! This is awful!" gasped Mollie, as the blast and rain struck
her full in the face.

"Keep on!" called Betty, grimly.

"Which way?" asked Amy. "How dark it is!"

"Not when it lightens--that's one good thing about it," said Cousin
Jane, cheerfully.

"It's nice you can see some good points," laughed Mollie--yes, actually
laughed, and the girls marveled at it. But Mollie had that rare quality
of "keeping her nerve," if I may be pardoned that expression, so often
and effectively used by my friends, the boys.

"We had better go forward," suggested Betty. "We didn't pass any houses
for quite a while as we were coming up here, and there may be one not
far off just ahead. Or we may find a cross-road. Advance, I say!"

"And I agree," spoke Mollie. "Come on."

She and Betty led the way, carrying the lamps, which gave but an
uncertain light, and that only in one direction--forward. However, the
road, though now quite muddy, was a level one, and in fairly good
condition.

Forward they tramped through the rain. It is on such occasions as
these--when something goes wrong, upsetting all prearranged plans, and
making life seem miserable--that true courage of a sort, comradeship,
good-fellowship and real grit are best shown. And, to the credit of the
outdoor girls be it said that, now they had taken the "plunge" none of
them showed the white feather. They were brave under any circumstances
and this very bravery strengthened their tired nerves.

On they splashed through muddy puddles, protecting themselves from the
rain as best they could by their coats. But occasionally the wind would
whip them open, letting in the moisture that already had soaked the
garments well.

"There doesn't seem to be any shelter," remarked Amy, hopelessly, when
they had gone perhaps half a mile.

"Oh, don't give up yet," suggested Mollie.

They kept on, and came to a cross-road.

"Now which way?" asked Betty.

"Straight ahead," proposed Mollie.

"To the left," offered Grace.

"The right," was Amy's choice.

"I think--I'm not sure, but I think I see a light off to the left," said
Cousin Jane.

"A light!" cried Betty. "Then we ought to head for that."

"But I am not certain," went on Mrs. Mackson. "Look, girls, is that a
light?"

They grouped around her, and gazed in the direction she pointed.

"Hold the lamps the other way, and we can see better," suggested Grace.

"Hold the lens against your skirts, Mollie," said Betty. "That will make
dark-lanterns for us."

She and Mollie did this, and in the intense blackness, that, for the
moment was not illuminated by a lightning flash, they peered about them.

"It _is_ a light!" exclaimed Grace. "Thank goodness!"

"I think so, too," added Mollie, as she glimpsed a point of
illumination. "Come on, girls! They won't refuse to help us."

Much encouraged they kept on. The rain increased, but they did not so
much care now. The thunder was just as hard, and the flashes of heaven's
fire was vivid, while the wind seemed more powerful. But they kept on.
The light they had seen seemed to grow brighter. Then it suddenly
disappeared.

"Oh dear!" cried Grace, despairingly. "It is gone!"

"Never mind," said Mollie. "They may have taken it to another room, or
put it out to go to bed. But we can find the place, as long as we are on
the right road."

On they stumbled, and then Betty, who was a little in the advance gave a
cry--a cry of joy.

"Here is the house!" she cried. "It is all dark, but we will knock."

By the lightning flashes they saw, set some distance back from the road,
a large house. By the same flashes they saw leading up to it a path,
much overgrown with weeds. And back of the house were big trees. The
rest was not very distinct, but at least shelter was offered them.

"Come on!" urged Betty, resolutely.

"Suppose there are--dogs?" faltered Amy.

"If there are they would have barked before now. But I don't believe
even a self-respecting dog would bother us on a night like this," said
Mollie. "Come on."

They advanced up the old path, that was overgrown with weeds.

"I don't believe any one lives there," ventured Grace, in a low voice.

"If they do they don't keep the place in very good condition," spoke
Cousin Jane. "It's a shame to let it get so run down."

Mollie was knocking on the door. The sound of her knuckles seemed to
echo through an empty house. The hearts of the girls were despairing
again. Once more Mollie knocked. No answer.

"No one at home," she murmured. "And yet the light!"

She gave a little cry.

"What is it?" asked Betty.

"The door--it opened of itself!"

"Nonsense! Perhaps it was not shut, and you pushed it!"

Betty flashed her light forward. It shone on the old door, that was
slowly swinging open, seemingly of its own accord. Then a bare and
deserted hall was observed.

At that moment there came a vivid lightning flash, and before the
thunder could echo Grace cried:

"We're at the haunted house of Shadow Valley!"




CHAPTER XV

QUEER MANIFESTATIONS


Curiously enough it was gentle Amy who made a remark that saved the
day--or should I say night? For it was after dark.

As the girls literally shivered, following the exclamation of
Grace--shivered as much from the chilling rain as from the terror
induced--Amy said, with such a queer intonation:

"Do you suppose that door opened itself to invite us in?"

There was a moment of silence. Then Grace giggled, Betty caught her
breath in a gasp, Mollie went into a perfect gale of laughter, and
Cousin Jane--well, she said it herself afterward--she snickered.

"Amy, that's the most sensible thing I've heard since this series of
midnight adventures began," declared Mollie.

"And since the door did open to let us in, suppose we take advantage of
it," suggested Betty, "and go in."

"What--into the--the haunted house!" and Grace's voice was shrill.

"Now see here!" began Betty, and her voice was as severe as she could
make it, for she recognized that now was the time to get the situation
well in hand. "This house is no more haunted than you are, Grace Ford."

"But--but----"

"'But me no buts,'" quoted Betty, merrily--as merrily as possible under
the circumstances. "We are going to be sensible--and--go in."

Suiting the action to the word she advanced into the hall, through which
the wind was now sweeping in rather mournful gusts. Mollie hesitated a
moment, and then followed her chum. The action of the two leaders with
the lanterns had a good effect on the others.

This might have been accounted for in two ways. The presence of Betty
and Mollie in the hall may have had its effect, or the kindly lights of
the auto, glowing so cozily, disclosed a shelter that, whatever its
disadvantages, at least afforded dryness.

Then, too, the taking away of the lights from the three of the party who
remained outside may have added to the effect. At any rate Grace stepped
into the hall, followed by Cousin Jane, and then timid Amy, finding
herself alone on the small porch, scurried in.

"Well, we're here!" said Betty, with a smile--rather a pale effort to
tell the truth, but a smile nevertheless. "Now what is the next thing to
do?"

"If we had only brought something to eat," sighed Grace. "And our
chocolate outfit!" for they carried one, with a small alcohol stove,
that they might make a hot drink when they stopped at noon for luncheon.

"No use crying over missing chocolate," said Mollie. "We're here, under
shelter, anyhow; and we can keep dry. Now if we can find anyone at home
we'll beg their hospitality for the night. Maybe they can get us a
meal--if we pay for it."

"There's no one living in this house--I'm sure of that!" declared Amy.
"Smell the musty odor--and--see----" she pushed open a door leading from
the hall, and directed Betty's hand so that the lantern flashed inside.
The room was bare and empty. "No one at all," she insisted. "The house
is deserted."

"Well, so much the better," declared Grace. "That is, if there are
no--no----" she did not finish, but looked around rather apprehensively.

"Ghosts--say it!" commanded Betty, sharply. "The oftener you use the
word the less it will frighten you."

"Look here!" exclaimed Mollie. "I don't believe we're in the--the
haunted house at all."

"Why not?" demanded Grace.

"Because this isn't at all like the kind of a house a millionaire would
build. It's--common. You can see for yourselves."

It did indeed seem so.

"But we were close to the end of Shadow Valley, where Kenyon's Folly was
built," insisted Grace, "and we turned in nearer to it when we took that
cross-road. I'm sure it's the place."

"Well, it's a queer thing to be insisting that you are in a haunted
house," remarked Betty, "but I am beginning to believe now that we are
not. At least I agree with Mollie that this doesn't look at all like the
place called Kenyon's Folly."

As the storm thundered and roared about them the girls looked around the
hall and room. Truly it was but a poor structure, much fallen into decay
now, yet at heart it was sound. Paint and decoration would do much to
restore it.

"I think I can explain it," said Amy.

"Do then," begged Grace.

"Don't you remember, Mr. Lagg told us that there was a housekeeper's
residence built to connect with the main structures?" she said. "There
is a sort of covered passage, I believe, that goes to the main castle,
as it were."

"Then the real haunted house must be--back there," and Grace pointed
toward where they had observed the thick trees.

"Yes. We are only in the--annex," said Betty. "But it suits me."

"If we only had something to eat and drink we would--annex that,"
observed Grace. "I'm starved!"

"Let's have a look around, anyhow, as long as we are here," suggested
Mollie. "We may as well stay here for the night----"

"For the night!" cried Grace.

"Yes. Where else can we go? I'm not going out in that storm again if I
can help it. We're dry here, at least. Just listen to that rain!"

"It's coming down in torrents!" exclaimed Betty. "We simply can't go
out."

"And it will give us something to do to explore a bit," added Mrs.
Mackson. "Come along girls. Who knows but what we may find a table all
set for us by fairy hands, as we used to read of in the story books?"

They paused for a moment. Not a sound came from the rooms and passage
about them. Only the storm raged outside.

"Well, let's--let's----" began Mollie.

"Oh, come on!" cried Betty, as her chum hesitated. "At least we have
lights."

"And I'm going to take off my wet coat," said Grace.

"Oh, if we could have a fire!"

"There's a fire place," said Betty, flashing her lamp into the room the
door of which Amy had opened. "And, I do declare, some old boards and
boxes! Why can't we have a fire?"

The idea appealed to all of them, and presently, taking heart, they
entered the room, and piling some boxes, splintered boards and papers on
the old hearth, set them ablaze.

As the ruddy flames leaped up the broad chimney they gathered about,
much cheered, though still hungry.

"If we only had something to eat," sighed Grace. "I wonder, if by chance
the former inhabitants left some morsels of food? Suppose we take a
look?"

The others hesitated a moment, and then Mollie said:

"I'm with you!"

She caught up the still-glowing auto lamp, and led the way, the others
following.

"Up stairs; or down stairs?" she challenged.

"Or in my lady's chamber?" completed Betty, with a laugh.

They went through various rooms. All were deserted. Here and there they
saw discarded and broken furniture. But there was no sign of recent
habitation. The house was musty and damp, but they were glad of shelter
from the storm.

"Only my poor auto!" sighed Mollie. "I hope nothing happens to it."

"It can stand the weather," said Grace. "What is beyond here, I wonder?"
she said, as they came to a pause before a closed door.

"Let's look," suggested Betty.

Like other portals in the house this one was not locked. Betty pushed it
open, and a long passage was revealed.

"The way to--the haunted house!" exclaimed Mollie, rather dramatically.

"Hush!" begged Grace.

"Silly!" admonished Betty. "Come on."

She plunged into the passage. The echoing footsteps of the others
following could be heard. She came to another door, opened it, and gave
a cry of delight.

"Girls--supper!" she exclaimed, and, holding her light high up, she
flashed it on a collection of groceries. Boxes of sardines there were,
dried herring, crackers, some butter in a carton, a loaf of bread,
canned tomatoes and peaches, and with all some dishes--knives and forks,
spoons, and, most useful of all--a can-opener, and a corkscrew--and--a
bottle of olives!

"Oh joy!" exclaimed Grace. "The fairy prince has been here!"

"Grace!" remonstrated Amy, as her friend caught up the bottle of olives
and proceeded to open it. "We don't know whose they are."

"So much the better; our consciences won't trouble us. And if anyone
comes to claim them we can pay for what we eat--I have money!" and she
jingled her silver purse, "And now, 'let good digestion wait on
appetite, and health on both,'" she quoted. "Fall to!"

The girls laughed, but they did "fall to." Cans and tins were opened,
crackers and slices of bread spread, and with peach juice to drink, for
they did not like to draw any water, fearing it might not be fresh--they
ate--and ate--and ate again.

"Oh, how good I feel!" cried Grace, as there came a pause.

"But how in the world do you imagine this stuff got here?" asked Amy.

"Why seek to inquire?" spoke Mollie. "That it is here is sufficient for
me. Another olive, Betty, dear?"

"The--our friend the ghost may have provided it," said Grace.

"You are coming on bravely," commented Betty. "If you will----"

She paused--they all did--mouths half opened. For from somewhere in the
structure came a hollow and terrifying groan, and then followed the
unmistakable sound of clinking metal, while a bluish light flashed
around them. Then came another long-drawn cry--a shrill, eerie wail, and
both their lights went out, leaving them in total darkness, while the
storm shrieked about the old house, rocking it, and swaying it as though
to tear it from its foundations.




CHAPTER XVI

"SO YOU HAVE COME BACK!"


Screams and frightened exclamations on the part of the girls followed
the queer manifestations. Even Cousin Jane gave a cry of alarm, and
clung to Betty. In fact, everyone was clinging to some one else, the
table having been deserted at the first alarm.

There was silence for a moment--no, not altogether a silence, for the
noise of the storm indicated that it was not in the least lessening, but
there was comparative quiet in the room, and then again came that
strange bluish, flickering glare, and the metallic clanging sound. Then
there was that startling, hollow groan, that seemed to echo and re-echo
through the deserted house.

"Oh! Oh!" moaned Grace. "This is awful--terrible!"

It was sufficiently terrible there in the darkness, illuminated only by
the lightning, or by that weird blue glare that seemed to come from no
place in particular, but which shone through the whole room--throwing
into ghastly outlines the faces of the girls.

Their lamps had gone out--or been blown out--they did not know which,
and as they clung to each other, their hearts pounding, every startled
nerve on the alert, Amy gasped:

"What--what made the lights go out? Can anyone tell?"

Even then, Betty confessed afterward, she felt a hysterical desire to
propound the old question of where a certain Biblical personage was when
the light went out, but instead Grace answered before her:

"They were blown out by--by----" she hesitated.

"By the wind!" exclaimed Mollie, quickly. "What else? There's an awful
draught in here. Who has the matches?"

It was the most sensible thing she could have said under the
circumstances, and it somewhat relieved the tension.

"I have some," answered Grace. "But--but what has happened, anyhow?"

"It's the thunder and lightning," declared Cousin Jane. "It must have
struck somewhere around here. It hit our barn once, and I noticed
something the same as now. Maybe that put out the lights."

"Well, let's put them in service again," proposed Betty. "I don't like
the dark."

"Neither do I--in here," spoke Mollie. "Please strike a match, Grace."

The interior of the old house was quiet now, as with fingers that would
tremble in spite of her efforts to still them, Grace lighted a match,
and applied the flickering flame to the wick of one of the lamps which
Betty opened. Then, as the cheerful yellow glow shone around them, Amy
cried:

"Oh, smell that sulphur!"

There was the unmistakable odor in the rather close air of the room.

"It's from the match," said Mollie.

"No, I didn't use a sulphur match," said Grace.

"It's the lightning," declared Cousin Jane. "I noticed that smell, too,
when our barn was struck, and I felt as if pins and needles were
sticking in me."

"Gracious! I hope that doesn't happen here!" exclaimed Betty, as she
helped Grace light the other lantern. Then the girls looked at one
another. From the faces they glanced to the table. Nothing there had
been altered, nor had the room changed in appearance.

"Well, I'm glad it's over," said Betty with a sigh of relief. "I was
certainly scared at first."

"So was I," admitted Mollie. "I really thought it was--the ghost."

Grace let out a startled cry.

"Stop it!" commanded the Little Captain.

"Well, I wish she wouldn't--blurt it out that way," Grace complained.

"Let's finish the meal," suggested Mollie. "There is some left, and
there's no telling when the owner--or owners--may come along. If we've
eaten it all up they can't do any more than make us pay for it, which we
are perfectly willing to do. But if there's some food still left they
might stop us from eating it. So let's begin again, girls."

"I've had all I want," faltered Grace.

"She's sorry because there are no chocolates," laughed Betty.

"No, I'm just too nervous to eat any more," said the tall, willowy one.
"Oh, wasn't it awful? Those groans--the clanking of chains----"

"How do you know they were chains?" challenged Betty.

"Well, they sounded like them, anyhow."

"That's what we thought on Elm Island, and you know how that turned
out."

"Oh, well, yes; but this is different," protested Grace. "These hollow
groans--there they go again!" and she clutched Amy's arm so suddenly
that a cracker and herring sandwich the latter was eating went to the
floor.

Indeed there did sound through the deserted house a queer, groaning
noise, as if some one was in distress. Betty gave voice to this
suggestion, saying:

"Oh, girls, I wonder if any one can be--hurt?"

"Well, I'm not going to look!" cried Grace. "Oh, let's get away from
this terrible place. I'd rather be out in the storm than here!"

"In that rain?" asked Mollie, as they listened to the down-rush of
water. It even drowned the noise of the groans.

"That is only the wind," declared Mrs. Mackson, though she looked over
her shoulder apprehensively. "The wind, moaning down an old chimney, or
in some broken window, and around a corner--I have often heard it that
way."

"You're a comfort, at least," murmured Betty. "But, girls, I really
wonder if it could be anyone in trouble? Someone who took refuge in here
from the storm, as we did, and who, wandering about, fell and got hurt.
That girl, perhaps--the one from the tree----"

She paused, looking about for some support of her theory.

"Nonsense! How could she be here?" asked Mollie.

"Well, it's not very plausible," admitted Betty. "But some one is
certainly in this place."

"Don't say that!" cried Grace.

"Don't be silly," advised Betty. "Why, of course some one is here, or
has been here. Else how would that food get here? That is not ghostly,
at all events. It was very material, and satisfying, and I'm deeply
grateful for it. It stands to reason that some one expected to eat it.

"My theory is that some one, traveling perhaps like ourselves, only
maybe not in an auto, was overtaken by the storm. More provident than we
they had lunch with them, and brought it in here, intending to eat it.
Then some accident happened to them, or----"

"The ghost carried them off," interrupted Mollie, with a glance of
defiance at Grace, who shuddered, and looked behind her.

"Anyhow they're not here now," went on Betty. "And I don't know but that
it is our duty to look for them."

"Never!" breathed Amy.

"At least we can go to the front door, and see if anyone is passing whom
we can hail, and ask for help. If we could get a man, now----"

"Or even a good-sized boy," broke in Mollie.

"Yes, even a boy would do," conceded Betty. "We could get him to go with
us into the other part of the house. There was where all the
manifestations seemed to come from."

"Well, let's go to the front door and look," proposed Cousin Jane. "That
can do no harm, and really I don't like to think of anyone being in
distress."

"Especially after we've eaten his lunch," put in Grace.

"How do you know but that it is a 'her' and not a 'him'?" asked Mollie.

"Nobody but a man would come in here--after dark."

"But we girls did."

"Oh, look how many of us there are. There is safety in numbers."

"Well, I wouldn't be here if there was any other place to go," declared
Grace. "Come on, if we're going," and she moved toward the door, keeping
close to Betty meanwhile.

"There must have been some one here, or else how did we see the light
which we followed, and which brought us here?" Mollie wanted to know.

"That, too, may have been caused by the lightning," said Cousin Jane.

"You are bound to ascribe everything to nature," objected Mollie. "It's
nice of you, but perhaps not correct."

"Well, you know that electricity does queer things," declared the
chaperone. "It might easily cause flickering lights, though I'm not
saying but that some one has been here--the food proves that."

"Perhaps all the ghost is, after all, is lightning; or some tramp, who
has made this his headquarters," said Betty. "Mr. Lagg would be glad to
know that."

"We'll tell him," suggested Mollie. "It's a pity, while we are here,
that we don't solve the mystery of the haunted house. Of course,
strictly speaking, we are not in the mansion proper, but we could go
there----"

"Don't you dare!" cried Grace.

They were going along the passage by which they had entered. The rain
was not coming down so hard now, and the lightning and thunder were less
frequent. The door was swinging to and fro on its hinges, swayed by the
wind which blew in gusts up and down the passage.

Mollie was in the rear, carrying one lantern, with Betty in the lead
with the other. They had almost reached the outer door, and were eagerly
hoping they would see some friendly passer-by when a noise behind her
caused Mollie to turn quickly. She saw a tall white object in a
proverbially ghostly winding sheet. It had come from a side room.

The thing stretched out two white arms, and hands clutched themselves in
Mollie's long hair, which had come loose and was hanging down her back
in glorious tresses. Then a snarling voice cried:

"So you've come back; have you! Well, you won't get away from me again!
Now you get in there!"

Mollie screamed. The others, adding their startled voices to hers,
beheld the white figure catch the frightened girl by the arm, and thrust
her into the room. Then the door was slammed shut, a key turned in the
lock, while the white figure turned and fled down the passage, as a
flash of lightning threw its ghostly outlines into weird relief, and a
crash of thunder followed.




CHAPTER XVII

CONSTERNATION


The other girls and Mrs. Mackson stood spellbound for the moment, and
then their senses came back to them, and they realized the need of
acting at once.

"Mollie! Mollie!" cried Betty. "Where are you? What happened?"

She started back down the hall, but Grace caught her.

"Don't--don't!" Grace pleaded.

"But I must--I shall--Mollie--some one Has taken her--thrust her into
that room!"

"Yes--it was the ghost--I saw it!" Grace fairly screamed, "and they'll
get you!"

"I don't care if they do! We must go to Mollie. Come, girls, to the
rescue!" cried Betty, resolutely.

"But let us get some one to help us first!" insisted Amy. "We ought not
to face that--that thing alone!" and she gasped, so rapidly was her
heart beating.

"We're not alone!" insisted Betty. "There are four of us, to one--one
man."

"How do you know he was a man?" demanded Grace.

"Didn't I hear him speak? It was a man's voice. Some man, for purposes
of his own, is masquerading as a ghost, and he probably tried to
frighten Mollie and the rest of us to keep up the reputation of the
mansion for being haunted. If none of you are going back, I'll go
alone!"

Betty started down the hallway, and her example was one of the things
needed to infuse courage into the others. Not that Cousin Jane
especially needed it, for she had already made up her mind, as had
Betty, that something must be done, and that soon.

"Of course we must rescue Mollie!" the chaperone declared, emphatically.
"Anyhow, that fellow ran away, after locking her in the room. Come back
there."

Rather timidly, it must be confessed, they advanced until they stood
before a door. There were several along the hall, opening into various
rooms, apparently.

"It was here," said Betty.

"No, this one," declared Mrs. Mackson, indicating another opposite.

Betty turned to Grace and Amy.

"I was too frightened to look," admitted Grace.

"And I didn't see," confessed Amy.

"Well, there's one way to prove it--we'll call," spoke Betty. She raised
her voice and cried:

"Mollie! Mollie! Don't be frightened. We haven't deserted you! In which
room are you?"

They paused, waiting for what they expected would be a tear-choked
answer, but none came.

"Mollie! Mollie!" cried Betty again, her tones trembling now.

Anxiously they waited, but there was no response.

"She isn't there!" gasped Amy. "Oh, Betty!" and she began to cry.

"Hush!" cautioned Mrs. Mackson. "Probably the poor child has fainted,
and can't hear us. It's enough to make any one faint. But I'm sure this
is the room," and she indicated the one she had pointed out. "We must
break down the door and get her."

Not expecting the door to open, she turned the knob, but, to her
surprise, the portal swung back, creaking on rusty hinges.

"The light--quick!" the chaperone called to Betty.

The remaining lantern from the auto--one being with Mollie--was flashed
into the apartment. It took but a glance to show that it was empty.

"I thought it was this one," said Betty, trying to keep her voice from
trembling, as she moved to the door she had insisted was the right one.

She tried half a dozen times. The door was locked.

"She's in--there!" gasped Grace.

Again Betty called aloud, repeating Mollie's name over and over again,
but there was no answer.

"Oh--oh, what can have happened?" faltered Amy. "Poor Mollie!"

"At least we know that it was perfectly natural what happened--however
mean and unjust it was," declared Betty. "We have to do with natural
forces, and----"

Through the old house there once more sounded that mournful groan,
chilling the very blood of the girls, and causing them to cling
together. Several times were the groans repeated, and then there shone,
as if from a distance, a bluish light, and there came the clank of
metal.

"Oh--oh!" cried Grace.

"Quiet!" commanded Betty. "Mollie, are you in there?"

The storm had, in a measure, ceased now, and the only sounds from
without was the falling of the rain.

"That--that couldn't have been thunder or lightning," said Betty, with a
puzzled air.

"It was the wind--that is still blowing," insisted Mrs. Mackson. "Don't
be frightened, girls. We must get Mollie out of that room. She has
certainly fainted, and when she comes to she will be horribly frightened
if we are not with her. Try the door again, Betty."

Betty did so, but it would not give.

"We must break it down!" decided the chaperone, resolutely. "Is there
anything we can use?"

"There's a chair in that other room," said Amy, indicating the apartment
they had looked in, only to find it untenanted. "We might use that."

"The very thing!" declared Mrs. Mackson. "We'll get it!"

She started for the other room, followed by the others, when Grace
cried:

"Hark!"

They listened.

"What is it?" asked Betty.

"The sound of carriage wheels out in the road. And I heard a man's voice
speak to his horse."

"Maybe it's the--one who caught Mollie, and he's taking her away,"
faltered Grace, who seemed to have a faculty of suggesting unpleasant
possibilities at the wrong time.

"Then we must stop him!" cried Betty. She turned toward the front door,
but a short distance away. The others hurried on after her and saw, out
in the road, the dim outlines of a carriage. There was a driving-light
on the dashboard, and by its gleam the girls could make out the dark
form of a man alighting.

"At least he's not--a ghost!" whispered Amy.

"Help! Oh, please help us!" screamed Grace.

"Hello, there! What's the trouble?" asked a pleasant voice. "I'll be
with you in a minute. Whoa there, Jack, old man! Don't get uneasy. Show
your light, please, so I can see where you are."

Betty flashed her lantern, and in its rays a man came up the weed-grown
path. The girls were almost crying for sheer relief.




CHAPTER XVIII

THE PRISONER


Mollie tumbled in a heap on the floor of the room, into which the
white-robed figure had thrust her. She gasped once or twice, for her
breath had grown short, not alone from fright--though she admitted that
she was terribly scared--but from the rough treatment she had received.
Then, as she endeavored to get to her feet in the darkness--for her
lantern had fallen from her hand and been extinguished--she fainted, and
fell back. Her heavy mass of hair, uncoiled and loose, served as a
cushion, and so saved her as she crashed backward.

This much of Mrs. Mackson's theory was correct. Mollie could not answer
the frantic calls of her chums, for she was insensible.

How long she remained in this condition she could not afterward tell,
but it could not have been for long, since she was strong and healthy,
and it was merely a case of overwrought nerves, and a severe mental
shock, which did not amount to anything serious.

Poor Mollie heard the ringing of innumerable bells as if from some land
beyond the clouds. Queer lights, even in the darkness, seemed to dance
before her closed eyes. She felt a pressure, a sense of
suffocation--this was the stagnant blood resuming its circulation.

Then consciousness returned so suddenly that it was painful. Mollie
raised herself by leaning on her hands and murmured:

"Where am I? What happened? That figure in white--oh, and the
girls--Betty--Grace--Amy!" she cried.

But none answered her, for by this time the others were outside watching
that very welcome man approach.

Mollie waited, and then, as her thoughts arranged themselves in order in
her brain, she began to plan what to do for herself.

"In the first place," she reasoned, "I am not seriously hurt. That
fellow, whoever he was, just thrust me into this room. And it was no
ghost, either," she went on, as she felt her arm, which she was sure had
been bruised by the grasp of the mysterious one. "I'd better make a
light, I think. Then I can see where I am. Oh, but what can have
happened to the others? I hope he didn't get them, too!"

The thought was terrifying. She dismissed it.

Mollie was a practical girl, as must needs be one who drives an auto.
She had pockets--a woeful lack with many--and matches.

It was the work of but a few seconds to set aglow the extinguished
lantern, and how Mollie blessed the thought that had prompted taking
both side lights with them. Otherwise she would have had to remain in
the gloom. The lantern had not broken in the fall, and soon a cheerful
glow made the room less gloomy, though it was a large apartment, and
there were many flickering shadows, while the corners seemed in total
darkness.

"But there's nothing there--can't be," decided Mollie, as she rose to
her feet. "I just won't let myself be frightened."

Flashing the light about the room, the girl-prisoner made it out to be a
large apartment, void of anything save a few broken sticks of furniture,
and a litter of papers. The paper on the walls was mildewed and hanging
in strips. There was a damp and musty smell in the place, but--joy of
joys to Mollie--no rat holes. The floor was solid, and she could see no
openings where the creatures might get in.

"So far--so good," she said aloud, and the sound of her own voice, in a
measure, reassured her.

"I wonder had I better call again?" she thought. "Yes, it will be best."

And so she sent out a ringing cry for her chums. But the room had thick
walls--the door was a solid one, and, as Betty, Amy, Grace and Mrs.
Mackson were having a surprising time of their own just then, they did
not hear the appeal.

"I'll have to depend on myself," thought Mollie. "Well, I can do it, I
think!"

She paused a moment to gather her thoughts together, and, being a girl
of method and order, she began at the beginning.

"In the first place, let me think how I got here," she mused. "Something
in white grabbed me, and thrust me here. It was a very human
touch--depart the ghost theory. I believe, after all, that Mr. Lagg was
right--it is some one trying to make out that this place is haunted in
order to get it for a lower price. The food supply proves that, I think.

"Anyhow, here I am--pushed in by some man masquerading as a ghost. That
much is certain. And what was it he said, as he caught hold of me--'So
you have come back!' That is all I remember. This would seem to indicate
that I had been here before, and that he was either expecting me, or
wanting me.

"A case of mistaken identity, at all events, for I never should have
come back, had I been here before, and that I was never here before is
positive. Come, Mollie, we are getting on in this deduction business.
Some one mistook me for some one else, and that shows that it is not
really me who is wanted. That's good.

"Then, if that's the case, the sooner the mistake is discovered, and
rectified, so much the better. I shall be released as soon as that queer
man in the winding sheet discovers his error.

"And he ought to do it soon, for he seemed very anxious to get me back,
and doubtless he will soon come to find out why I--or the person I am
supposed to be--went away."

Then Mollie had another idea. She reasoned this out as she flashed the
rays of the lamp about the bare apartment.

"But why should I wait for that man to come back?" she asked herself.
"There might be trouble when he discovers that I am not the person he
thinks me. He may be angry. And, though doubtless Betty and the others
will do all they can for me, I had better see if I can help myself.

"Oh, isn't it all queer? The folks at home will never believe it when we
tell them."

Mollie went quickly over the different happenings of the night, and
tried to figure out a reason for the various ghostly manifestations.
That they were the work of some one endeavoring to depreciate the value
of the property, she was certain.

"That man may have hired some girl who looks like me to help him," she
thought, "and she may have become afraid, or worried, and left. Then I
have to blunder in here, and in the dark he takes her for me. I'm sure
that's it."

Then came a change of mood.

"But what is the use of speculating and guessing about it?" Mollie
mused. "I had much better see if there is a way out. Oh, joy! A
window--two of them!"

She approached the casements, realizing that as she was on the ground
floor the sills could not be very high from earth. But though she saw
that the catches on the frames were broken, and though she managed to
raise one sash, it was with a jolt of disappointment that she saw the
windows were heavily barred.

"A regular prison!" gasped Mollie. "This must have been a most peculiar
house--barred windows. No wonder people shun it. Ugh! It gives me the
creeps."

She flashed her lamp on the wooden sill, into which the iron rods were
screwed. Then a wave of hope came into her heart. She saw rotting wood
and rusting iron. She pushed on one bar. It gave slightly.

"I can force them out, I'm sure!" she exclaimed aloud. "Oh, for
something to use!"

Her light shone around the room--on a pile of broken chairs. She ran and
grasped the leg of one. It was heavy and solid.

Mollie placed it between two of the bars, and pried. She was strong, and
it did not take all of her muscle to force the ends of the rods from the
rotting wood of the sill. A child might have done it. In a moment she
had a space sufficiently wide to enable her to get out.

And then she heard a sound out in the road. It was a carriage being
driven rapidly.

"Perhaps that man went for some vehicle in which to take me away!"
thought the girl, aghast. "I had better not go out! What shall I do? My
light! I must put it out, or he'll see me," and she turned the flame of
the lantern down, leaving herself in darkness.




CHAPTER XIX

MYSTIFIED


"What can I do for you? What seems to be the trouble?" inquired the man
whom Betty and the others had hailed as they rushed to the door of the
strange house, and peered out into the darkness.

"We're in a haunted mansion, and the ghost has taken Mollie away!" cried
Grace, hysterically. "Please make him give her up. Oh, please do!"

But Betty paid no heed to her chum. Instead she exclaimed:

"Mr. Blackford! It's Mr. Blackford--the man who lost the five hundred
dollar bill!"

"What!" cried Amy.

"I certainly am that same Mr. Blackford," answered the young man, "and
if these aren't the Outdoor Girls, I miss my guess!"

"That's who we are--all but one of us," spoke Betty. "Oh, it's true.
Some one has Mollie a prisoner here! We tried to open the door, but
it's locked. Will you come and help us try to batter it down?"

"I certainly will. But what are you doing here? Are you camping?"

"Camping in a haunted house? I guess not!" exclaimed Grace. "The idea!
Oh, but it's good to have--a man!"

"Thank you!" laughed Mr. Blackford, who, it will be remembered, was so
fortunate as to recover his lost money through the efforts of our
heroines, as told in the first volume of this series.

"You--you aren't afraid; are you?" asked Amy.

"Afraid of what?"

"The ghost!"

"Ghost!" and he laughed heartily.

"Well, there really have been some strange goings-on here," said Betty,
standing in the doorway with her chums. She looked out at the weather.
It was not raining much now, and the thunder and lightning had about
ceased.

"Suppose you explain," proposed Mr. Blackford. "I happened to be in this
part of the country looking after some of my business interests. I was
delayed longer at one place than I expected to be, and got caught in the
storm. When I came past this house I thought I would see if I could not
be accommodated over night, for my horse was tired and needed stabling.
Instead I----"

"You are appealed to to help lay a ghost and find a missing girl," broke
in Betty. "But, oh, the last is most important! Please come and get
Mollie out!"

"Yes, I guess that is the most important. You can tell me about it
later. But I surely was astonished to meet you girls again--glad of it,
though. Now for the prisoner. Lead the way, Miss Nelson."

Flashing her lantern, the other girls keeping at her side, and Cousin
Jane bringing up in the rear, Betty advanced to the locked door. Mr.
Blackford tried the knob, and then called:

"Stand back, whoever is in there. I'm going to burst this door open!"

Grace cried out.

"Quiet!" commanded Betty. "It is the only way."

Mr. Blackford placed his shoulder down near the lock. There was a
cracking and splintering of wood, and the door suddenly flew open with a
crash.

"Mollie! Mollie!" cried Betty, as she flashed the rays of her lamp
inside.

But the room was empty! Mystified, the girls, their chaperone and Mr.
Blackford, stared about it. No Mollie was there!

"But I'm sure she was thrust into this room by that figure in white,"
declared Betty. "We all saw it."

"Are you sure?" asked Mr. Blackford, slowly.

"Positive. She was put in this room for some unknown purpose, and she
can't have gotten out, for we have been in the hall all the while, and
the door was locked."

"There is the window," said Mr. Blackford, as he took the lantern from
Betty. Walking over to the casement he uttered an exclamation, as he saw
the bent bars.

"This explains it!" he cried. "She has escaped!"

"Or else the--the ghost--came in here and took her away," faltered Amy.

"Well, we'll have a look about outside," suggested the young man. "There
may be marks that will aid us, especially as the ground is soft now."

They all went outside. The rain was but a mere drizzle now. The fury of
the storm had passed, and the night was becoming calm. The old house,
and the mansion beyond it, which could now be seen dimly back of a
fringe of trees, was silent and seemingly deserted, even by the ghost.
There were no more queer blue flames, no more hollow groans and clanking
noises.

"I didn't think to look and see if the other auto lamp was in that room
where poor Mollie was," said Grace. "Did you?"

"Yes," spoke Betty. "I looked. It was gone."

"We had better not all go under that window at once," suggested Mr.
Blackford, as they neared the casement with the bent bars. "Let me go
alone, with the light, and I'll see if I can make out any footprints."

Carefully he examined, and then he gave a joyful exclamation.

"It's all right!" he cried. "There are the marks of but one person's
shoes, and they are your friend's, I'm sure--for they are small. It
plainly shows where she let herself down out of the window."

"Oh, how glad I am!" cried Betty. "But where is she now? Can you tell
which way she went?"

"Only for a short distance," answered Mr. Blackford, as he flashed the
rays of the lamp to and fro. "Then comes grass, and I am not
sufficiently good on the trail to track a person over grass. However,
we are sure of one thing--that she got out of the room herself, and ran
off. She was not carried away."

"That is everything," murmured Grace. "Oh, what a relief!"

"But where can she be now?" asked Betty, in bewilderment. "Why did she
not come back to us?"

"Probably she thought you, too, had left the place," suggested Mr.
Blackford. "We must make further search. But suppose you tell me all
that happened. I am interested in this--ghost."

The girls told all that had occurred--told it in gasps--by
exclamations--by "fits and starts," as Betty expressed it. At first Mr.
Blackford was amused--then he was more interested--finally he was
impressed.

"I don't like this," he said, when he had been informed of the failure
of Mr. Lagg to dispose of the property because of the "ghostly"
manifestations. "It looks to me as though some trick was being
perpetrated here. Possibly something more than a trick. There may be
crimes contemplated. The authorities should be notified.

"Of course I don't believe in ghosts--neither do you--and, from what you
say, it must have been a very human one who caught Miss Billette. But
she is our most important consideration now. We must find her! We must
search outside, for clearly she is not in the house, though it will do
no harm to take another look."

"Go back there!" cried Grace, aghast.

"Why not?" asked Betty, coolly. "You forget we have a man with us now."

"Certainly we'll go back there and look," spoke Mrs. Mackson, in
business-like tones. "Though I don't believe Mollie would go back,
unless it was to look for us. And how can she have gone in without us
seeing her?"

"There may be many entrances to an old, rambling place like this," said
Mr. Blackford. "It will do no harm to look about in it again, and then
we can search up and down the road."

Rather gingerly the girls entered the old house again. The light was
flashed in all the rooms downstairs, but the girls balked at going to
the upper floors, though Mr. Blackford proposed it.

"Mollie would not go up there," said Betty, positively.

"Perhaps not," admitted Mr. Blackford.

"I think we ought to go back to where we left the auto," said Mrs.
Mackson. "That would be the most likely place for Mollie to go."

"I agree with you!" exclaimed the young man, quickly. "We'll go to the
stalled auto."

As they were leaving the place there burst upon them a shrill, weird
cry, like that of some animal, and it was followed by that deep groan
that vibrated through the vacant rooms.

"The ghost! The ghost!" cried Grace, clutching Mr. Blackford's arm.




CHAPTER XX

SEEKING THE GHOST


They all stood still for a moment. The eerie noises gradually died away,
and then they all became conscious of a strong smell of sulphur.

"What is that?" asked Betty, in an awed whisper. She was more impressed
than she had been.

"Smells as if some one had lighted old-fashioned brimstone matches,"
answered Mr. Blackford.

"And it isn't the lightning, now," spoke Amy, looking at Mrs. Mackson.
"It's the--ghost."

"A very material ghost, in my opinion," said the young man, who had so
providentially come along. "I'm going to find out who it is."

He started toward the passage that led to the mansion.

"Don't you dare leave us here alone!" cried Betty, half tragically. Mr.
Blackford looked at her a moment, and then added quietly:

"Well, perhaps it will be better to postpone the investigation. And
there is your missing friend. But I would like to know who has an
object in doing this. I think Mr. Lagg would like to know, also."

Once more the mysterious house was in silence, and with a last look
around at the mildewed walls, the girls and Mrs. Mackson preceded Mr.
Blackford out of it.

"I'll get your secret yet!" exclaimed the young man, as he turned to
look at the strange habitation. "Now, where did you leave the auto?"

Fortunately, Betty had a good sense of direction and could lead the way,
flashing her lamp at intervals. Mr. Blackford had proposed that some of
the girls wait while he drove one of them to the stalled car in his
carriage, it holding but two. But the girls refused to consider this,
wishing to stay together.

"And, too," said Betty, "we might miss poor Mollie on the way."

"That is so," he had agreed. So they tramped along the muddy road,
making the turn on to the main highway, and then, when Betty was about
to remark that they must be near the car, Grace cried out.

"Oh, what is it now?" demanded Betty, a trifle sharply, for her nerves
were fast giving way under the strain, though the Little Captain had
good nerves, ordinarily.

"There's a light!" exclaimed Grace.

"Yes; and it's at the auto!" added Amy. "Oh, girls----"

"Perhaps it is Mollie," suggested Mrs. Mackson. "Call to her."

"Mollie! Mollie!" Betty cried, shrilly, and the others joined in with a
school call.

"Oh, are you there?" came back the answering hail. "Oh, I am so glad."

"That's Mollie!" said Betty, in great relief. "We are united again," and
presently the girls were clasping the lost one in their arms, and, let
the truth be told--weeping over her for very joy.

"But of all things--to see you!" exclaimed Mollie, to Mr. Blackford, as
she fastened her auto lamp on the bracket.

"Yes, and I was surprised to find your friends. But how did you get
here?"

Mollie told how she had come to her senses, and had lighted the lamp she
had with her. Then, when she was about to escape through the barred
window she had heard the sound of a carriage approaching.

"That was mine," said Mr. Blackford.

"If I had known it I would not have been so frightened," remarked
Mollie. "As it was, I put out my lamp, and then, when no one came for
me, I decided to jump out. It was not far to the ground. Then I ran, and
at first did not know what to do. Then I decided to try and find my
auto. I must have blundered into the road, but I got here at last. I was
going to hide in the car, and I wanted to leave some sort of a light on
it so no one would run into it in the dark."

"But didn't you hear us talking and calling?" asked Amy.

"No," answered Mollie. "You see the room is some distance from the front
of the house. And I was too frightened to know what I was doing.
Besides, I fainted, at first, you know. And I thought you girls would
run when--when you saw that white thing that grabbed me. I was
disappointed when you were not at the auto here."

"What was--what was it that grabbed you?" faltered Amy, in awed tones.

"You needn't be so mysterious about it," laughed Mollie. She could laugh
now--the strain was over. "It was a man who grabbed me, I'm certain of
that. And a man I have seen before!"

"Seen before!" cried Betty. "What do you mean? Who was he?"

"I don't know. But what I do know is that he had a queer scar on the
hand that grabbed me. And somewhere--I can't recall now, I'm in such a
flutter--I've seen that man and his scar before."

"Try to think," urged Mr. Blackford. "We must get at the bottom of this
outrage, and if you can give us a clue it will help a lot."

"I can't think now," protested Mollie, weakly. "Maybe it will come to me
later. Oh, what a night! If only our auto would work we could get
to--some place."

"Suppose you let me have a look," suggested Mr. Blackford. "I know
something of the mechanism of a car."

"Oh, if you can only get this one to--mote!" sighed Mollie.

Mr. Blackford proved that he did know considerable about a car, for he
soon discovered that the trouble was a simple disarrangement of the
ignition system.

"There!" he exclaimed, when, by the light of a held-up lantern, he had
made the necessary adjustment. "We will see if it won't go. Of course
you can't use the self-starter, since your storage battery is out of
order, but we can crank up in the old-fashioned way."

"The car generates its own current when it is running," said Mollie.
"But to-day I have been running on an extra battery, as something
seemed to be the matter with the other one. T must have it looked to."

Mr. Blackford whirled the crank, and at once there sounded the welcome
throb of the powerful motor.

"Oh, joy!" cried Betty. "Now we can go!"

The auto was indeed in running order again.

"What are your plans?" asked the young man.

"We'll go on to Wendell City, the next town, and stop there for the
night," said Mollie. "We are very damp and miserable, and need rest,
and----"

"Food!" said Grace. "That little lunch we had was not very substantial."

"There were no chocolates for Grace," spoke Amy.

"I think I will drive on to the next town also, since it has stopped
raining," went on Mr. Blackford. "I will see you in the morning, and
we'll talk over this business some more. I want to lay that ghost if we
can. You'll get to the town ahead of me in your car."

"And we'll see you at the Lafayette House," suggested Mollie. "We are
going to stop there."

Four weary and much exhausted girls, and a rather used-up chaperone,
were soon enjoying the comforts of the hotel. They had 'phoned on ahead
for rooms that morning, but the proprietor had about given them up.
However, it was only eleven o'clock.

"Wouldn't you think it was--next day?" asked Betty, as she noted the
time.

"A great deal happened in a short space," said Mrs. Mackson. "Oh, but it
is good to be in a house again."

"One that isn't haunted," added Grace.

Morning, as Betty put it, "dawned clear and bright," and with it came
refreshment to the Outdoor Girls. They almost forgot the terrors of the
night, and when Mr. Blackford met them in the parlor, he having arrived
about an hour after they did, he found a very different set of young
ladies.

"Well, are you ready for the ghost hunt?" he asked, with a smile.

"I am!" declared Mollie. "I think that ought to be investigated. The
authorities should be notified, not so much for what happened to me--to
all of us--as because of what might happen to others. Then there's poor
Mr. Lagg--he'll lose what money he put into that property if the value
goes down because of the ghosts. I say let's try to discover the
secret."

"I'm with you!" exclaimed Betty, and Amy and Grace gave rather halting
assents. Mrs. Mackson gamely agreed to do as the rest did.

"I did hope I could go with you to-day," said Mr. Blackford, "but I have
received a telegram that calls me away. I wonder if you could postpone
it?"

"Of course!" exclaimed Betty. "There is no great hurry, and besides, I
think we will all be the better for a rest. Is your business prospering,
Mr. Blackford?"

"Yes, indeed, thanks to the way you girls helped me out by finding my
five hundred dollar bill. But this is not business. I don't mind telling
you that I am seeking for a long-lost relative--a sister--and I have
engaged a firm of private detectives to look for her. They just sent me
word that they are on the track of a person who may be the one I have
been looking for so long. So, under the circumstances----"

"Oh, of course, go by all means!" exclaimed Mollie. "We can meet you
later, anywhere you say."

"Then suppose we meet here, say a week from to-day, and try for the
ghost secret. By that time I may have found my sister, or have suffered
another disappointment--and there have been many of late," and he
sighed.

The week that followed was a busy one for the Outdoor Girls. Mollie had
her car put in perfect order, and they toured over many miles of
splendid country. They had minor happenings and adventures, but nothing
of moment, if we except a few punctures and a blowout. Oh, yes, they did
run over a dog, breaking the creature's leg. But it was the dog's fault,
and Mollie steered out of the way so quickly that she nearly sent the
auto into a tree.

At the appointed time Mr. Blackford was at the hotel.

"Well, are you ready to go ghost-hunting?" he asked.

"We are!" cried Mollie, and once more they set off for the "haunted
mansion," determined to discover its secret if at all possible.

"I wonder what we'll find?" said Betty, as the car raced on.




CHAPTER XXI

THE MISSING GIRL


"Who would ever think we could be frightened here?" asked Mollie.

"Yes, it's quiet enough now," replied Betty. "Not a sign of a ghost."

"Nor flashes of blue fire," added Grace.

"Nor hollow groans," remarked Amy.

The Outdoor Girls, with Mrs. Mackson and Mr. Blackford, had reached the
so-called "haunted mansion." The day was a sunny one, perhaps that added
to the lack of nervous fears they felt as they stopped the auto, and
entered the place. This time they had gone to the mansion proper, having
driven through what were once beautiful and extensive grounds. But they
had long since fallen into a tangle of weeds and shrubbery.

They had decided to explore the mansion itself first, and go from there
to the annex, as it might be called--the former abode of the housekeeper
and staff of servants the rich Mr. Kenyon once kept.

During the week that had intervened, the keys of the place had been
secured from Mr. Lagg. He was delighted that the girls had finally
consented, through a chain of circumstances, to investigate the queer
manifestations.

"You'll do better than the boys, I'm sure," said the storekeeper.
"Anyhow, they've gone camping. Now find out what that ghost is, and--get
it out of there. I have received word from the doctors who want to use
the place as a sanitarium, that if I cannot, within a week, deliver them
the property with a guarantee that there will be no disturbances, they
will take another place."

"We will do all we can," promised Mollie.

They entered the old mansion. Truly it had been a magnificent place in
its day, and even now the hand of decay had touched it but lightly. With
a few repairs, some decorating, a cutting down of the trees that were
too thick about the place, it could be made into a most cheerful
sanitarium.

"And it's so big!" cried Grace, as she wandered about the spacious
rooms. But she had hold of Amy's arm, it might be noticed, and both
girls kept rather near to Mr. Blackford. He had come back unsuccessful
in his search for his sister.

"Yes, it must have been fine here when the place was new," agreed
Mollie. "Well, let's go at this search systematically."

"That is the only way," spoke Mr. Blackford. "We might start in at the
top and work downward."

They did this, ascending by means of the grand staircase to the second
floor, and thence to the third and fourth. The latter contained but few
rooms, mostly for storage, it seemed, and it was soon evident that no
ghost--of the human kind at least--had been at work here. The dust and
grime of years had accumulated in the apartments.

The third floor offered no solution. This was rather larger in extent,
and contained many guest-rooms. Some showed evidence of having been
beautifully decorated, being paneled in tapestry that now hung in shabby
strips--a relic of former beauty.

It was not until the second floor was reached that anything like a
promising clue was found. Meanwhile many queer nooks and corners had
been explored. Mr. Kenyon had evidently built the house after his own
eccentric ideas, for it contained strange rooms, connecting with one
another by little, unexpected passages, short flights of stairs, and
many winding ways. Some of the rooms might well have been secret ones,
so strangely were they tucked away.

But in two apartments on the second floor--two rooms that had evidently
been choice guest chambers--the searchers came upon signs which
indicated clearly that some one had been in them recently. There was
less dust, and in one corner was a pile of bags and rags that seemed to
indicate a bed. On the hearth--there were big fireplaces in each
room--were ashes that had been hot not many days gone by.

"Tramps!" exclaimed Mr. Blackford. "To my way of thinking tramps have
been sleeping here."

"Do you think the ghost was a tramp?" asked Mollie. "The one who caught
me?"

"He may have been."

"But why was he all in white?"

"Probably to keep up the illusion. We haven't gotten to the bottom of
this yet. Let's keep on."

But aside from the two rooms no others in the big mansion showed signs
of habitation. All were gloomy and dust-encumbered. On the first floor
nothing was discovered, and the cellar yielded no clues.

"Well, all we have established so far," said Mr. Blackford, "is that
someone has been sleeping here. Now let's keep on to the annex, and see
if we can establish a connection. It may be that the secret is there."

They found the passage that led from the mansion to the house in which
so much had happened to them that stormy night. There was a room in the
main house, whence the passage began, and this room, too, showed signs
of having been used recently.

And when they came to the place where the girls had dined so
unexpectedly they saw unmistakable signs that other meals than the one
they had helped themselves to had been eaten there.

"Our friend, the ghost, has been here since," said Mr. Blackford.
"Perhaps we shall have to set a trap for him."

They walked on, their footsteps echoing and re-echoing through the
silent old house. They were in the annex now, but a search there
revealed nothing.

The girls looked at one another, and then at Mr. Blackford. He shook his
head.

"I confess I am baffled," he said. "I did hope to find something. But we
haven't come across it. If there was a systematic effort to give the
impression that this mansion was haunted, there would have been some
evidences of it.

"I mean we would have some material evidence. There would have to be
some way of producing that bluish light, that groaning sound and the
clanking of metal. But, unless the apparatus is more cleverly hidden
than I suspect, it isn't here."

"Then the only thing to do is to give it up, and confess ourselves
beaten," suggested Betty.

"I don't like to do that," spoke Mollie.

"Well, we can go over the place again," remarked Mr. Blackford slowly,
"but I don't see----"

He paused abruptly and seemed to be listening. The girls glanced at one
another curiously.

Then there sounded through the house a cry as of fear, and it was
followed by a heavy fall that jarred the floor.

Mr. Blackford sprang to the door, rushed down the hall, and a moment
later cried:

"Girls, come here!"

"Have you--have you found the ghost?" asked Betty.

"No, it's a girl, and she seems to have fainted."

"A--a girl!" faltered Mollie.

They all ran to where Mr. Blackford's voice sounded. It was in the very
room where Mollie had been held a prisoner. And there, in the center of
the apartment, supported in Mr. Blackford's arms, was a girl. At the
sight of her Betty cried:

"It is she! It is she! It is the girl who so strangely ran away from us.
The one who fell out of the tree! Carrie Norton!"




CHAPTER XXII

A SWINDLED FARMER


Surprise at Betty's exclamation held her companions silent for a moment,
and then Mollie cried:

"Are you sure, Betty? Are you sure? Can it be possible that we have
found her again?"

"Of course I'm sure!" declared Betty, as she advanced to assist Mr.
Blackford in caring for the girl, who lay white and senseless in his
arms. "You'll be sure, too, as soon as you take a good look at her.
Isn't that hair evidence enough?" and she let some of the girl's
luxurious tresses, that had come unbound, slip through her fingers. "And
see her face--and there's the scar she got when she fell from the tree.
Of course it's the same girl!"

"I believe it is," murmured Grace. "But how came she here?"

"Another one of the mysteries to be explained," said Amy. "But hadn't we
better see first if we can revive her?"

"An excellent idea," declared Mrs. Mackson. "If one of you will get some
water, I'll use my smelling salts on her. And we must loosen her collar.
It seems too tight."

Mr. Blackford had turned over the care of the girl to the others. He
hurried to a spring they had discovered in the yard of the old house,
and presently handed in a tin of water.

The strange girl opened her eyes, looked about in fear, and then, seeing
herself surrounded by the friendly faces of our girls, on her own
countenance there came a look of relief.

"What--what happened?" she gasped. "Oh, I remember. I fainted. I heard
someone in the house, and I thought it was--I thought he was coming for
me. Oh, he isn't here; is he?"

"We don't know who you mean," said Mollie, gently.

"My--the man who calls himself my guardian, but who has used me very
cruelly," she said. "I ran away from him, and then I learned that there
might be a way to escape him forever. I came back to get certain
papers--but I heard noises in the old house, and----"

"I guess we made the noises," said Betty, with a smile. "We were looking
for a--ghost!"

"A ghost!" cried the strange girl, starting up.

"There! I am sorry I said that!" exclaimed Betty, who thought, too late,
of the effect it might have on the overwrought nerves of the stranger.
"But really there isn't any ghost, you know."

The girl smiled weakly.

"Take some more water," urged Mrs. Mackson. "And smell these ammonia
salts."

"I'll go get some of that cold chocolate in the vacuum bottle,"
volunteered Grace.

"No, please," said the girl. "I shall be all right presently. I can go
on. I didn't find the papers I wanted. I was sure he had hidden them
here."

"We hope you won't go until you have told us a little something about
yourself," said Betty, with an inviting smile. "We don't want to pry
into your private affairs," she went on, "but we would like to help you.
And please don't disappear so mysteriously again. You are the girl who
fell out of the branches of a tree; aren't you?"

"Yes," and she smiled faintly, "I am Carrie Norton. I knew you as soon
as I saw you all again. Oh, please don't think harshly of me, but I have
been so worried I did not know what I was doing. I have always regretted
repaying your kindness so shabbily, but really----"

"Now don't worry a bit about that!" broke in Mollie. "Just rest
yourself, and when you feel able, tell us all you wish to, and we'll do
all we can for you. Do you feel better?"

"Oh, yes, much. I am not given to fainting. It was just fright that made
me call out when I heard the noise you made, and then I went over--all
got black before me. Oh, I am feeling stronger every minute."

She proved it by getting up, and the girls helped her arrange her dress,
dusting it for her, and aiding her in coiling up her heavy hair.

"What lovely braids you have," observed Grace.

"Do you think so? They have made trouble enough for me."

"I suppose so much hair must be inconvenient in warm weather, but most
of us would be willing to put up with it," spoke Amy.

"I didn't mean it that way. I will tell you soon. But I ought to be
going."

"Then come with us," invited Betty. "We have plenty of room in the car,
and we can take you to your friends, to a hotel, or anywhere you like
to."

"And we can take you to our homes," added Mollie. "We have not far to
go, and, as we are only touring for pleasure, we have no schedule to
upset. Come with us. We have finished our ghost hunt."

"Then let us get away from here before my guardian happens to come
back," suggested the girl. "I will explain all I can to you, though it
is rather complicated."

"Would you mind explaining first," asked Betty with a smile, "why you
were up that tree? We have all puzzled over that so much."

"I went up there to hide from my guardian, or the man who calls himself
such," said the girl. "I suppose it seems strange, but really that was
the only thing I could think of. And it was not hard to get up, for the
branches were low. You see I had just run away from him, from this very
house, when he brought me here, and said that it was to be our home."

"This place your home!" exclaimed Mollie. "Why I thought Mr. Lagg had
bought it."


"I don't know Mr. Lagg," said the strange girl, with a shake of her
head. "But I'll explain in sections, as it were. My name is Carrie
Norton, and my guardian is Samuel Clark. At least, that is his right
name. He goes by several, according to the nature of the business he is
in."

"He must be a queer sort of man to change his name," suggested Mr.
Blackford, who had rejoined the girls.

"He is queer," agreed Carrie Norton, "and not altogether honest, I fear.
To be brief, when my parents died, several years ago, he assumed charge
of me. He had been associated with my father in business, and he said
the will provided that he was to be my guardian. I was too
grief-stricken to question that, but I was shocked when, instead of
having a comfortable fortune, as I supposed, there was little or
nothing, and Mr. Clark said I must go about the country with him,
helping him sell goods. He was a sort of commercial traveler, dealing in
different things at different times."

"Yes," said the girls.

"Finally we came to this section, and one day he came to this house. He
said he owned it, and that we were to live here. I saw that it was
deserted, and I made up my mind I would not stay. The very next day,
when he was making preparations to remain over night, I ran away. Oh, I
was so lonely. I did not care what became of me. Then I thought I saw
him coming down the road after me, and I went up in the tree.

"Perhaps I was foolish, but I scarcely knew what I was doing. I guess I
must have fallen asleep, for I was in a comfortable position, and I had
lost much rest of late. Then I heard an auto horn--I thought all sorts
of things--I awoke with a start, and fell out."

"Then our auto did not strike you?" asked Mollie.

"No, I was just stunned by the fall. When I woke up, and found myself in
that farm house bedroom, I did not know what to think. One idea
possessed me, that I must get away--that I would not go back to him--my
guardian. So I slipped away, and I have been wandering about ever since.
I managed to get enough office work to help support me, for I am a
business college graduate and I had a little money of my own with me.
Sometimes I stopped at hotels, and again at boarding houses. My one idea
was to keep away from that man."

"And you dropped part of a letter; did you not?" asked Grace. "The day
you ran from the farm house."

"Yes," Carrie admitted. "I had written one I intended leaving for--for
that man. Then I decided not to and I tore it up just before I got out
of the window. I suppose I must have dropped a piece. It was a letter
saying I would never come back to Shadow Valley."

"How did you happen to come back here?" asked Mollie. "We were certainly
puzzled at your sudden departure."

"A little while ago," resumed Carrie, "I read something in a paper
referring to my case. It was a legal notice asking for news of my
whereabouts, and saying I would hear of something to my advantage by
calling on certain lawyers with papers to prove my identity. At first I
feared this was a trap on the part of my guardian, but I inquired and
learned that the law firm was a reputable one. There is a Mr. Allen
Washburn connected with it."

"In Deepdale?" cried Betty, her cheeks flaming.

"Yes. But how did you know?" asked Carrie.

"Oh, I am--slightly acquainted with Mr. Washburn," said Betty,
hesitatingly.

"Slightly--is good," murmured Grace.

"So I decided I would go see those lawyers," went on Carrie. "But first
I wanted the papers. My guardian had them, but I recalled that the day
we came here he placed them on the mantle in this room. I came back to
get them, but they were gone, and then I heard a noise--I fainted--and,
well, here I am, and you are here too, I see."

"It is quite a mystery," said Betty. "Now, I have this to propose. You
come home, with us, and we will take you to Mr. Washburn, or have him
come to see you. Perhaps he can dispense with the papers."

"Oh, I hope so!" Carrie cried. "If only I could have a new guardian, I
might be happy."

"Well, let's start on the road to happiness," said Mr. Blackford, with a
smile. "We haven't found the ghost, but perhaps it is just as well."

"Did you ever see any queer manifestations while you were here?" asked
Mollie of the girl.

"I was here only part of one day," she said. "I am glad it was not
dark--I should have been afraid. Oh, it must have been terrible for you
to have been caught by--by that man!" she said to Mollie. "Who could he
have been?"

"I am just wondering if it could have been your guardian," said Mollie,
a strange look on her face. "He said something about me having 'come
back.' Girls, I'm sure that was it!" she cried. "He took me for Carrie,
with my long hair----"

"We are coming on!" cried Mr. Blackford. "We will soon have this mystery
solved."

"What sort of a looking man was the one who caught you?" asked Carrie.

"I could not see--he had on long white garments."

"Well, let us get under way. The lawyers will be the best ones to settle
this affair," resumed Mr. Blackford, as he started for the waiting
auto.

They left the strange mansion behind. Whether it was "haunted" or not
they had failed to establish. But they had gotten on the trail of
another mystery.

It was while autoing toward the town of Franklin, on their way to
Deepdale, that the girls saw on the road a farmer standing beside a
carriage with a broken axle. The man was ruefully contemplating the
damage.

"Can we help you any?" asked Mollie, as she stopped her car. Mollie was
always glad to help people.

"Wa'al," said the man slowly, "if you had a new axle it would be a help.
But I know you haven't. What riles me most though, is that the rascal
will get away from me."

"Are you after some one?" asked Mr. Blackford, catching at the man's
words.

"Yes, I am; after as slick a swindler as has been around these parts in
a long time. He done me out of a bunch of money not long ago, and only a
little while ago I got word that the same man is peddling stuff in
Franklin. I hitched up, as soon as I could, intending to go to Franklin
and have him arrested. But this pesky axle had to break, and now I can't
go on. It's the only rig I have, too. I heard that the fellow intends
to go out on the noon train. Then I may never hear of him again."

"Can't you telephone?" asked Mr. Blackford.

"There's no 'phones around here, and if I did it would be hard work to
hold him. There'd have to be a warrant, and I'd have to swear to a
complaint. My mere word over the wire wouldn't be enough, I'm afraid.
And it's near noon now. I don't know what to do."

Ruefully he gazed at his disabled carriage.

"I have it!" cried Mollie. "Come in the auto with us. We have room for
one more, with a little crowding. We can get you there before noon, and
perhaps you can have the man arrested."

"Good!" cried the swindled farmer. "I'll do it!"




CHAPTER XXIII

"THAT'S THE MAN!"


"What will you do with your horse and carriage?" asked Mr. Blackford,
when the girls had made different seating arrangements to accommodate
Mr. Bailey, the farmer. "It won't do to leave it on the road; will it?"

"No, I'll have to fix that some way. We can't very well take it along
with us. But here comes Jim Bates. He'll look after my nag for me. Hi,
Jim!" he called as a man came driving past in a dilapidated wagon, drawn
by a bony horse, "Jim, jest look after my outfit; will you? Maybe you
can leave it in Pierce's barn until I come back. That isn't far. Pierce
is away, but his wife will let you, I guess."

"Where you goin'?" asked Jim. His horse had stopped of its own accord,
it seemed.

"Goin' in to Franklin."

"In that there machine?"

"Yep."

"Gittin' sort of stylish; ain't ye?"

"Mebbe. But I had an accident, and these young ladies was kind enough to
offer me a lift."

"In a hurry?"

"I sure am. I'm after that swindler. Heard he was in Franklin."

"Git out! Feller that sold you the interest in that patent soap?"

"Yep. That's how I was swindled," he explained to our friends. "This
faker come along with a wonderful soap. It would take the spots out of
everything--even the sun, he said. It did do good work when he
manipulated it. Well, I was foolish enough to give up some of my
hard-earned savings for the secret of how to make the soap. I bought the
stuff he told me, but the soap was a failure. He swindled me. Now I'm
after him."

"I hope you catch him," said Jim. "Go along in the buzz-wagon. I'll look
after your rig until you git back. Good-luck!"

They started off, the farmer going into details of how he had been
swindled. He was very thankful for the unexpected "lift" given him, and
declared that he would not have known what to do had not the auto come
along.

"We are only too glad to help you," said Mollie.

[Illustration: "'THERE HE IS!' CRIED THE FARMER, 'THAT'S THE MAN WHO
SWINDLED ME!'"

_The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car._ _Page 197._]

"We seem to be in the assisting business," remarked Betty, who sat
beside Mollie. "We're helping two birds with one auto."

"You mean Carrie?"

"Yes."

"Poor girl! I do hope we can help her, and get someone to look after her
so she won't worry. Mr. Washburn will know what to do."

"Yes, Allen is getting to be quite a lawyer," admitted Betty, with a
blush.

They swung into Franklin.

"Where do you think would be a good place to look for your man?" asked
Mr. Blackford of the farmer.

"I heard he was selling tooth powder in the public square. He has a
stand, or something."

"Then suppose you head for there," suggested Mr. Blackford to Mollie.
She nodded.

They saw a crowd of people in the square in front of the court house. In
their midst stood a man on a raised platform--a platform gay with flags.
His strident voice could be heard extoling the merits of his wares. The
auto came nearer. The vendor's face could be plainly seen.

"There he is!" cried the farmer. "That's the man who swindled me!" He
stood up in the machine. Those in the crowd gazed wonderingly at him.

A gasp from Carrie caused Grace to look at her. The girl's face was
white.

"What is it?" asked Grace in alarm.

"That man--he--he is my guardian!" cried Carrie. "Oh, don't let him see
me!" and she cowered behind Amy and Grace.




CHAPTER XXIV

THE FAKER CAUGHT


Several things happened at about the same time, and so quickly that the
girls confessed afterward that they were fairly dizzy. Consequently they
were not altogether sure of the sequence of events themselves.

But as that does not so much matter as does the ultimate effect, I will
set down the various happenings in such order as will best indicate to
the reader the proceedings.

Naturally the attention of Mr. Blackford, and the girls, was first drawn
to Mr. Bailey, the farmer, who was shaking his fist at the man selling
tooth powder on the platform. His announcement that this was the man he
sought was sufficiently dramatic.

Then came Carrie's startled cry. Betty and Mollie turned around to look
at her.

"Are you sure he is the man who called himself your guardian?" asked
Mollie. "Don't make any mistake."

"I am not making a mistake," murmured Carrie, still holding herself
behind Amy and Grace. "He is that horrid man! Oh, don't let him see me!"

"What, have you a case ag'in him, too?" asked Mr. Bailey.

"She thinks so," explained Mr. Blackford. "We've got to act quickly
here. Go up a little closer, Mollie."

A lane was opened for the auto, amid the crowd. The faker stopped in the
midst of the "patter" concerning his wonderful powder, which "would make
the teeth like unto the milky pearls of the Orient."

The man on the platform turned pale, and then a sort of sickly green
color spread over his face. He had caught sight of the farmer standing
in the auto. Perhaps he also had had a glimpse of Carrie Norton. At any
rate he said:

"And now, my dear people, I must leave you. This is the last chance you
will have to purchase Tuckerman's Tooth Tester at this price. I thank
you one and all for your attention, and for your patronage. I must leave
at once. I have been summoned by telegraph to attend a conference of the
International Dental Society, who wish to purchase the secret of my
wonderful invention. I will bid you good-day," and he started to descend
from his platform.

"No, you don't!" cried Mr. Bailey. "No, you don't get away like that!
The dental society kin wait until you pay me back the money you swindled
out of me on that soap deal! Hold him, somebody, until I kin swear out a
warrant. I've caught you, old fellow!"

The faker kept his nerve. He came down from the platform carrying his
valise. The crowd was around him.

"Good people, let me pass!" he cried, authoritatively.

Mr. Blackford sensed the danger. The man might get away after all.

"Here!" he called to a constable in the crowd. "That man is a swindler!
He should be arrested."

"I haven't any warrant," answered the officer, weakly.

"You will have one in five minutes!" said Mr. Blackford. "I tell you to
hold that man. Mr. Bailey, get to the nearest justice of the peace as
soon as you can. Swear out a warrant and have it brought here. Officer,
arrest that man!"

There was something more than disinterested authority in Mr. Blackford's
tone. The constable worked his way through the crowd.

"Good people, let me pass! Let me pass!" the faker was saying. "I have
to catch a train!"

"Not much you won't! If I have to hold you myself!" muttered Mr. Bailey,
angrily.

"You get to that justice as fast as you can," directed Mr. Blackford.
"We'll hold this man, if we have to chloroform him!"

The farmer jumped from the auto, and hurried off, a dozen hands pointing
out the office he desired in the court house. The constable reached the
tooth powder vendor.

"You're under arrest!" the officer said, laying a hand on the man's arm.

"Don't you touch me! Under arrest? On what charge?"

He shook himself loose, and stroked his beard nervously, also his
luxurious hair, but this time it was black, instead of white--dyed
obviously.

"On the charge--on the charge," began the constable nervously. "You're
arrested on a charge that's soon to be here. Now don't make any fuss,
but come along with me."

"I decline to go with you unless I know what I am charged with!" shouted
the faker. "You let me go, or it will be the worse for you!"

Mollie arose in her place at the steering wheel.

"He's arrested on the charge of assault and battery!" she called in her
fresh, strong voice. "I make the charge, Girls!" she exclaimed, turning
to the others, "that's the man who thrust me into that room, and locked
me there. That's the ghost. I recognize him by the scar on his thumb!"

The crowd was in an uproar as the constable caught hold of the man, and
quickly snapped a pair of handcuffs on his wrists.

Then as the girls in the auto stood up, the better to see, Carrie was
revealed. The faker, closely held by the constable who had arrested him,
and by a brother officer who had hurried up, gave the strange girl one
look. Then those who were near him heard him mutter:

"I guess the game is up!"




CHAPTER XXV

EXPLANATIONS


Betty furnished the next sensation. As the man in charge of the officers
passed near the auto, poor Carrie cowering away from him, though he no
longer had it in his power to harm her, the Little Captain exclaimed:

"Girls! Girls! He's the old hair doctor--the man we met with the gay
wagon--Bennington's Restorer!"

"Who is?" demanded Amy.

"That man--the one they have arrested. He's the one we gave the bolt
to."

"Ha! That settles it!" cried Mollie. "That was where I first saw the
scarred thumb! It's all working out now! I didn't remember at first. His
hair is black instead of white."

"Dye," murmured Grace. "It is he all right!"

The farmer came hurrying through the crowd with the justice to whom he
had gone to make a complaint. Above his head he waved a paper, crying:

"I got it! I have the warrant. Now Mr. Faker, which ought to be your
name, you'll spend the rest of the summer behind the bars, on this
charge."

"Yes, and with another added to it, perhaps," said Mr. Blackford, with a
glance at Carrie.

The faker, which it is easier to call him, as he went by many names,
shrugged his shoulders philosophically. He saw that he was caught.
Perhaps he had been in the toils of the law before this.

He was quickly taken to the court house, where he was held on the
farmer's charge under such heavy bail that it was not produced. This
insured him being retained in custody.

"And now to attend to your case, Miss Norton," said Mr. Blackford, when
Allen Washburn had been telegraphed for, and promised to come. "So he
was your guardian; eh?"

"Yes, and since the girls recognize him for what he was part of the
time--a seller of hair tonic--I will explain a little further. He made
me pose in his cart, before the crowds, as one whose hair had been
restored and made long by his worthless stuff. Oh, it was shameful! That
is why I ran away from him!"

"I don't blame you," said Mollie. "And did his stuff do your hair any
good?"

"I never used a drop of it! Neither did he. It was trash! He used to
make me shake down my hair before the crowd, and then he would tell how
I used to have none at all, but by using his medicine it came. I always
had nice hair, before I ever met him! Oh, I can't forget it!" and she
sobbed a little.

"Never mind," said Betty, gently, "it is all over now."

And it was, as far as any further charge the faker had over Carrie
Norton. Allen Washburn came on with the papers in the case. It seems
that a distant relative of the girl, learned in a round about way that
Clark, or Bennington, to use but two of his names, had forged certain
documents in order to make it appear that he was her legal guardian.
This gave him control of Carrie, and her money, a tidy sum left by her
father. The girl he compelled to accompany him on his vending trips, but
when he went into the making of worthless hair restorer and obliged her
to pose as having benefited by it, she finally rebelled.

This distant relative, wishing to aid the girl, took the matter up with
a law firm, happening to hit on the one where Allen Washburn was
employed. The newspaper advertisement was inserted, and at last had its
effect.

The facts in the case were presented to the court after the faker's
arrest, and the judge lost no time in deposing him as Carrie's guardian.
He was obliged to give up the money he had wrongfully retained, and
Allen Washburn was, much to Carrie's delight, appointed to look after
her affairs.

"You'll be all right now, my dear," said Mollie, when the court action
was over.

"She will be, if Betty doesn't get jealous!" said Grace, with a laugh.
"Oh, I didn't mean anything!" she added quickly, as she saw her chum
frown. "Have a chocolate!"

Bennington, or Clark--the faker, to be brief--was thus held by the law.
In view of the other charges against him, Mollie did not press hers.

"It would only bring you into unpleasant notoriety," said Mr. Washburn.
"He will get a severe enough penalty as it is."

"He must have mistaken you for me," said Carrie, as they talked over the
thrusting of Mollie into the room. "Seeing you in the house whence I had
fled, and with your hair hanging down, he made a natural mistake,
thinking I had come back to him."

"Except that my hair is nothing like as lovely as yours, my dear."

"Oh, yours is fine, I think. But the dim light might have deceived him."

"But why should he dress up all in white--like a ghost?" asked Grace.

"Probably to play that part," suggested Betty. "That is one point we
haven't solved--how the ghostly manifestations were brought about. I
wish we could have solved that for the sake of Mr. Lagg."

"I fancy it is solved," said Mr. Blackford, with a smile. "It was the
faker, all the while."

"It was?" cried Mollie. "Did he do it on purpose?"

"No, he had no intention of being a spook, but he could not have done it
better had he planned it. I have been talking to him," and Mr. Blackford
nodded in the direction of the court house. "He made a clean breast of
everything when Allen hinted that it might have a good effect when he
came to be sentenced.

"It seems that he manufactured his hair-tonic in the haunted mansion. It
was necessary to heat it in a sort of furnace, and this made the
groaning sound you heard, it was caused by air pressure. Sometimes it
groaned and again it shrieked as the hot air rushed from the
ventilator."

"And the clank of the metal?" asked Grace, not without a look over her
shoulder, though it was broad daylight.

"That was when he stirred the stuff in the brass mixing kettle."

"What about the queer blue light, and the smell of sulphur?" asked
Cousin Jane.

"That was the burning of sulphur which he used in the preparation.
Sulphur is often used in hair-tonics I believe, though I don't know that
this man used it to any advantage. At any rate he burned it, making the
ghostly flashes of blue fire, and the smell. The flashes were reflected
from the room where he worked into the smaller house, by the big window
panes."

"But why did he dress like a ghost?" asked Mollie.

"That was a big white garment he put on to avoid soiling his clothes
when he made his hair-tonic mixture. And he really did mistake you for
Carrie, Mollie. He admitted as much, and asked to be forgiven. It was
his lunch you ate. He had prepared for a long stay in the house."

"Well, I guess we won't bother to pay for it," said Betty. "He's made
trouble enough. Then the mansion isn't haunted, after all?"

"No, and never was. It was simply the making of his hair-tonic there
nights that produced the effect. He says he never even knew that the
doctors who were to buy the place were frightened away, and the night
you girls stopped there he thought you had, as was the case, taken
refuge from the storm. He did not know he had frightened you, but when
he saw Mollie he made a rush for her, thinking she was his ward, come
back. He locked her up, intending to come for her later, when he had
taken off the furnace some of his boiling mixture."

"Then Mr. Lagg can sell his property after all!" exclaimed Grace. "I'm
so glad!"

And so was the poetical store keeper himself, when he heard the news. He
composed an eight-line verse on the subject, and insisted on rewarding
the girls, saying it was due to their efforts that the "ghost was laid."
He received a substantial sum for the old mansion, which was turned into
a sanitarium.

"And, now that all the explanations are explained," said Mollie a day or
so later, "we may as well resume our tour. What do you say, girls?"

"Fine!" cried Betty. "And we'll take Carrie with us. She needs a change,
and traveling around will benefit her."

"Though I traveled considerable after I ran away from that horrid man,"
said the girl, with a smile at her new friends.

"There is one regret," spoke Grace, "and that is that Mr. Blackford
didn't find his missing sister."

"I had some hopes that you might prove to be she," he said, looking at
Carrie. "However, I have not yet given up the prospect of finding her. I
am going to seek farther."

"Let's go for a long ride, anyhow, and then we can plan what to do for
the rest of the summer," suggested Mollie, and the girls went off in the
car.

And what occurred further to the chums may be learned by reading the
next volume of this series, to be entitled "The Outdoor Girls in a
Winter Camp; Or, Glorious Days on Skates and Ice Boats."

"And so there is no haunted mansion after all," remarked Betty, as they
rode on.

"Are you sorry?" asked Grace. "I'm not."

"Well, a haunt is so--romantic," spoke Betty.

"But I suppose it is just as well."

Eventually the false guardian was sent to prison for a long term, on
several charges. Mr. Bailey was not the only farmer he had swindled, it
appeared. The fellow had unexpectedly come to the old mansion, and had
boldly decided to use it for his purposes, learning that the title was
in dispute. It just suited his needs, and the hair-tonic was not the
only nostrum he made there after Carrie ran away. But the tonic was
alone responsible for the queer sounds and manifestations. On leaving
the mansion to go about peddling his wares, the man would take his
apparatus with him in the wagon, so there were few signs of his
occupancy.

Mr. Blackford bade the girls farewell a few days after the explanations
had been made, saying he was going to look up a new clue regarding his
sister. Carrie Norton was made welcome at the home of Betty, though she
often stayed for weeks at a time with the other chums. She had income
enough to support her now that her fortune was restored to her.

The girls completed their tour, having many good times which the boys
and the twins shared, the latter never forgetting to ask,
semi-occasionally:

"Has oo dot any tandy?"

And now that the Outdoor Girls have a prospect of "living happily ever
after," we will take leave of them.


THE END.




_This Isn't All!_


Would you like to know what became of the good friends you have made in
this book?

Would you like to read other stories continuing their adventures and
experiences, or other books quite as entertaining by the same author?

On the _reverse side_ of the wrapper which comes with this book, you
will find a wonderful list of stories which you can buy at the same
store where you got this book.


_Don't throw away the Wrapper_

_Use it as a handy catalog of the books you want some day to have. But
in case you do mislay it, write to the Publishers for a complete
catalog._




THE OUTDOOR GIRLS SERIES

By LAURA LEE HOPE

Author of the "Bobbsey Twins," "Bunny Brown" Series, Etc.

       *       *       *       *       *

          =Uniform Style of Binding. Individual Colored Wrappers.
          Every Volume Complete in Itself.=

       *       *       *       *       *

These are the tales of the various adventures participated in by a group
of bright, fun-loving, up-to-date girls who have a common bond in their
fondness for outdoor life, camping, travel and adventure. They are clean
and wholesome and free from sensationalism.

          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS OF DEEPDALE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT RAINBOW LAKE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A WINTER CAMP
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN FLORIDA
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT OCEAN VIEW
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN ARMY SERVICE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS ON PINE ISLAND
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT THE HOSTESS HOUSE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT BLUFF POINT
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT WILD ROSE LODGE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN THE SADDLE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AROUND THE CAMPFIRE
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS ON CAPE COD
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT FOAMING FALLS
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS ALONG THE COAST
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT SPRING HILL FARM
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS AT NEW MOON RANCH
          THE OUTDOOR GIRLS ON A HIKE

       *       *       *       *       *

GROSSET & DUNLAP, _Publishers_, NEW YORK




THE BLYTHE GIRLS BOOKS

By LAURA LEE HOPE

       *       *       *       *       *

          =Individual Colored Wrappers and Text Illustrations by=
          =THELMA GOOCH=
          =Every Volume Complete in Itself=

       *       *       *       *       *

The Blythe girls, three in number, were left alone in New York City.
Helen, who went in for art and music, kept the little flat uptown, while
Margy, just out of a business school, obtained a position as a private
secretary and Rose, plain-spoken and business-like, took what she called
a "job" in a department store.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: HELEN, MARGY AND ROSE=

A fascinating tale of real happenings in the great metropolis.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: MARGY'S QUEER INHERITANCE=

The Girls had a peculiar old aunt and when she died she left an unusual
inheritance.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: ROSE'S GREAT PROBLEM=

Rose, still at work in the big department store, is one day faced with
the greatest problem of her life.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: HELEN'S STRANGE BOARDER=

Helen goes to the assistance of a strange girl, whose real identity is a
puzzle. Who the girl really was comes as a tremendous surprise.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: THREE ON A VACATION=

The girls go to the country for two weeks--and fall in with all sorts of
curious and exciting happenings.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: MARGY'S SECRET MISSION=

Of course we cannot divulge the big secret, but nevertheless the girls
as usual have many exciting experiences.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: ROSE'S ODD DISCOVERY=

A very interesting story, telling how Rose aided an old man in the
almost hopeless search for his daughter.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: THE DISAPPEARANCE OF HELEN=

Helen calls on the art dealer on business and finds the old fellow has
made a wonderful discovery.


=THE BLYTHE GIRLS: SNOWBOUND IN CAMP=

An absorbing tale of winter happenings, full of excitement.

       *       *       *       *       *

GROSSET & DUNLAP, _Publishers_, NEW YORK




CAROLYN WELLS BOOKS

       *       *       *       *       *

=Attractively Bound. Illustrated. Colored Wrappers.=

       *       *       *       *       *

THE MARJORIE BOOKS

Marjorie is a happy little girl of twelve, up to mischief, but full of
goodness and sincerity. In her and her friends every girl reader will
see much of her own love of fun, play and adventure.

          MARJORIE'S VACATION
          MARJORIE'S BUSY DAYS
          MARJORIE'S NEW FRIEND
          MARJORIE IN COMMAND
          MARJORIE'S MAYTIME
          MARJORIE AT SEACOTE

       *       *       *       *       *


THE TWO LITTLE WOMEN SERIES

Introducing Dorinda Fayre--a pretty blonde, sweet, serious, timid and a
little slow, and Dorothy Rose--a sparkling brunette, quick, elf-like,
high tempered, full of mischief and always getting into scrapes.

          TWO LITTLE WOMEN
          TWO LITTLE WOMEN AND TREASURE HOUSE
          TWO LITTLE WOMEN ON A HOLIDAY

       *       *       *       *       *


THE DICK AND DOLLY BOOKS

Dick and Dolly are brother and sister, and their games, their pranks,
their joys and sorrows, are told in a manner which makes the stories
"really true" to young readers.

          DICK AND DOLLY
          DICK AND DOLLY'S ADVENTURES

       *       *       *       *       *

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK

       *       *       *       *       *

Transcriber's Notes:

Obvious punctuation errors repaired.

Title page, extraneous word "in" removed. (Twins in the Country)

Table of Contents, "65" changed to "68".

Table of Contents, "Track" changed to "Trace". (Trace of the Girl)

Table of Contents, "Fakir" changed to "Faker". (The Faker Caught)

Page 11, "criuse" changed to "cruise". (on a cruise in)

Page 19, "grammer" changed to "grammar". (grammar school)

Page 19, "floppish" changed to "foppish". (rather foppish lad)

Page 19, "Deedpale" changed to "Deepdale". (Dear Deepdale)

Page 26, "unconscions" changed to "unconcious". (make her unconscious)

Pages 27, 28, 30, "bed room" changed to "bedroom".

Page 30, "pyhsician" changed to "physician". (the physician pushed)

Page 32, "outisde" changed to "outside". (must look outside)

Page 46, "follow" changed to "fellow". (little fellow had)

Page 68, "VII" changed to "VIII". (CHAPTER VIII)

Page 72, "others" changed to "other". (while other nights)

Page 76, "spot" changed to "spots". (muddy in spots)

Page 113, "carbureter" changed to "carburetor". (the carburetor
slightly)

Page 140, "umistakable" changed to "unmistakable". (the unmistakable
sound)

Page 134, "thurogh" changed to "through". (went through various)

Page 135, "releaved" changed "revealed". (was revealed)

Page 154, "suddently" changed to "suddenly". (so suddenly that)

Page 178, "unsucessful" changed to "unsuccessful". (back unsuccessful
in)

Page 195, "by" changed to "my". (after my outfit)

Page 197, "bush" changed to "blush". (with a blush)

Page 197, "The" change to "They". (They swung into)

Page 201, extraneous "The" removed. (The crowd was)

Page 209, "colthes" changed to "clothes". (his clothes when)

Page 210, "an" changed to "on". (composed an eight-line)






End of Project Gutenberg's The Outdoor Girls in a Motor Car, by Laura Lee Hope

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE OUTDOOR GIRLS IN A MOTOR CAR ***

***** This file should be named 19561.txt or 19561.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/1/9/5/6/19561/

Produced by Marilynda Fraser-Cunliffe, J.P.W. Fraser, Emmy
and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
